
















	Omnicell Management Team






















Skip to navigation













Management TeamOmnicell is led by an accomplished, capable team of executives:


Randall A. Lipps
Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer, and Founder
Randall Lipps founded Omnicell in September 1992 with a passion for applying automation to healthcare. Under his leadership, in August 2001 Omnicell became a publicly traded company, and since 2003, the San Jose Mercury News has recognized Omnicell as one of the top Silicon Valley companies, as measured by market capitalization. Today, the company’s award-winning solutions are used in over 4,000 hospitals throughout the world, including 18 of the top 20 “America’s Best Hospitals” in U.S. News & World Report Best Hospitals, August 2016. Since 2009, Mr. Lipps has served on the Board of Overseers of the University of California, San Francisco (UCSF) School of Nursing. In 2013, he was appointed to the Board of Directors of Invuity, a provider of advanced photonics devices that improve surgical processes. Mr. Lipps also serves on the ASHP Foundation Board of Directors, the philanthropic arm of the American Society of Health-System Pharmacists, as well as the Board of Directors of Candescent Health, a company that is transforming the radiology care delivery model. Prior to founding Omnicell, Mr. Lipps served in senior leadership roles in the travel industry. He holds bachelor’s degrees in both Economics and Business Administration from Southern Methodist University. 


J. Christopher Drew
President, North American Automation and Analytics
J. Christopher Drew joined Omnicell in April 1994. Mr. Drew has served in various management positions at Omnicell, including Vice President of Branded Solutions and Director of Corporate Development. Prior to joining Omnicell, he was a financial analyst at Goldman, Sachs & Co. and at Brentwood Associates, a private equity firm. Mr. Drew received a BA in Economics from Amherst College and an MBA from the Stanford Graduate School of Business.


Dan S. Johnston
Executive Vice President and Chief Legal and Administrative Officer
Dan Johnston joined Omnicell in November 2003. Prior to that, he was Vice President and General Counsel at Be, Inc., a software company, and he was an attorney with the law firm Cooley Godward LLP. Mr. Johnston received a BS in Computer Information Systems from Humboldt State University and a JD from the Santa Clara University School of Law.


Peter Kuipers
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Peter Kuipers joined Omnicell in August 2015. Mr. Kuipers had served as CFO at Quantcast Corporation, a world leader in applying the power of big data and analytics to digital audience measurement and advertising. Previously he served as Executive Vice President and CFO at The Weather Company (TWC), operating The Weather Channel, weather.com, wunderground.com and its professional services division WSI. Earlier, Mr. Kuipers served in senior financial leadership roles at Yahoo!, Altera Corporation, General Electric Company, and Akzo Nobel. He holds a Master’s Degree in Economics and Business Administration from the Maastricht University School of Business and Economics in the Netherlands.


Nhat H. Ngo
Executive Vice President, Strategy and Business Development 
Nhat Ngo joined Omnicell in November 2008. Previously, Mr. Ngo led strategic business development for a business unit of Covidien, where he had global responsibilities as Vice President of Business Development and Licensing. Prior to joining Omnicell, he held a variety of senior leadership positions in marketing, sales, operations, strategic planning and corporate development at BriteSmile, Inc., a direct-to-consumer aesthetic technology company. Prior to BriteSmile, Mr. Ngo practiced corporate law at Shaw Pittman in Washington, D.C. He obtained a BS in Commerce, with a concentration in Finance, from the University of Virginia McIntire School of Commerce and a JD from the University of Virginia School of Law.


Rob Seim
President, Global Automation and Medication Adherence
Rob Seim joined Omnicell in January 2006. He served as Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President of Finance, Administration and Manufacturing from 2006 through 2015. Prior to that, Mr. Seim served as CFO of three early-stage technology companies, including Villa Montage Systems, a provider of residential broadband access management systems that he co-founded in 1999; Candera, a maker of network-based storage controllers; and Mirra, a vendor of personal backup servers which was acquired by Seagate. Previously, he held a number of senior financial management positions at Bay Networks, which was acquired by Nortel Networks in 1998. Mr. Seim began his business career in 1982 with IBM, serving in a variety of financial positions at three divisions over the course of 14 years. He has a BS in Accounting from California State University, Sacramento.


Jorge Taborga
Executive Vice President, Engineering
Jorge Taborga joined Omnicell in July 2007 as Vice President and Chief Information Officer, and in January 2009, was named Vice President of Manufacturing, Quality and Information Technology. In February 2013, Mr. Taborga was named Executive Vice President of Engineering. Prior to joining Omnicell, Mr. Taborga held a number of executive positions with Bay Networks and Quantum, and ran his own management consulting company. He also held executive roles in two cloud computing startups, fusionOne and Terraspring. Mr. Taborga’s earlier career included senior roles in product development with ROLM Systems and Thomas-Conrad. He received his BS and MS degrees in Computer Science from Texas A&M University. He is currently pursuing his PhD in Organizational Systems at Saybrook University.



















Search The Site:


Enter Search Keywords and Submit


*
































Omnicell's (OMCL) CEO Randall Lipps on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Omnicell's (OMCL) CEO Randall Lipps on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptMay. 8.17 | About: Omnicell, Inc. (OMCL) Omnicell, Inc. (NASDAQ:OMCL)
Q1 2017 Earnings Conference Call
May 04, 2017, 08:30 AM ET
Executives
Randall Lipps - Chairman, President & CEO
Peter Kuipers - EVP & CFO
Analysts
Jamie Stockton - Wells Fargo
Mohan Naidu - Oppenheimer
Matt Hewitt - Craig-Hallum Capital
Sean Wieland - Piper Jaffray
Raymond Myers - Benchmark
Gene Mannheimer - Dougherty & Company
Operator
Good afternoon. My name is Hope, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Omnicell First Quarter Earnings Announcement. All lines have been placed on mute to prevent any background noise. After the speaker's remarks, there will be a question-and-answer session [Operator Instructions] Thank you.
I would now like to turn the conference over to Peter Kuipers, Chief Financial Officer. Please go ahead sir.
Peter Kuipers
Thank you. Good morning and welcome to the Omnicell first quarter 2017 results conference call. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. Later we will conduct a Q&A session, and instructions will follow at that time. Joining me today is Randall Lipps, Omnicell Founder, Chairman, President, and CEO.
This call will include forward-looking statements subject to risks, uncertainties, and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. For a more detailed description of the risks that impact these forward-looking statements, please refer to the information in our press release today in the Omnicell annual report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 28, 2017 and in other more recent reports filed with the SEC.
Please be aware that you should not place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements made today. The date of this conference call is May 04, 2017, and all forward-looking statements made on this call are made based on the beliefs of Omnicell as of this date only. Future events or simply the passage of time may cause these beliefs to change.
Finally, this conference call is the property of Omnicell, Inc., and any taping, audio duplication, or rebroadcast without the express written consent of Omnicell, Inc., is prohibited. Randall will first provide an update on our business and then I will cover our results for the first quarter of 2017 and our guidance for the year. Following our prepared remarks, we will take your questions. Our first quarter financial results are, as usual, included in our earnings announcement, which was released earlier today and is posted in the Investor Relations section of our website at omnicell.com. Our prepared remarks will also be posted in this same section.
Let me now turn over the call to Randall.
Randall Lipps
Good afternoon, everyone. We're excited to discuss our first quarter results as well as our progress on the XT Series introduction.
Following the announcement at ASHP in December last year of the new XT Series we received great responses and have had good momentum among both existing and new customers.
I want to summarize our progress in three specific areas: First, we are winning in the market place across Omnicell’s comprehensive medication management platform. Secondly, we have good traction on XT with strong customer interest, and the XT Series is received with enthusiasm by new customers and by existing customers looking to add XT to their medication management platform. And third, we made great progress on conversion of G4, our older series, and AcuDose quotes and backlog to XT.
First, it’s clear that we are winning in the market place: During the first quarter, we had a strong New and Competitive conversions rate of 33% of bookings. This is a great indicator of the strength of the business. Around 75% of those were competitive conversions and the remainder were from Greenfield customers who had never automated before.

We believe that these new account wins combined with our installed customer base gives us a robust platform for the future growth driven by expansion, replacement, and upgrade sales as well as cross selling opportunities across our product portfolio and also our first quarter bookings are ahead of our internal plan.
Secondly, the XT Series is received with enthusiasm by new and existing customers. As of last week, we have delivered the XT Series product to approximately 175 sites, and the XT Series are live at over 50 sites. Both numbers are growing every day.
Both our internal and external surveys show very strong positive customer feedback. One of the top benefits of XT according to users was the increased speed of the XT Series, the reduction in time in the workflow is returning significant time to nurses. Of course, about 40% of nursing time is spent on medication management, so you can see why this time savings is significant.
A leading medical center in the United States recently commented that XT is a night and day experience compared to our last system from another vendor. Everyone loves the extra capacity, the large screen, the intuitive design, the clean design, and the ability to authenticate users in and out of the system very quickly has created much better work flows for our users.
Third, we are progressing well on our conversion of G4 and AcuDose-Rx quotes and backlog, and are ramping up the XT Series Revenue. Specifically, we've converted the vast majority of all G4 and AcuDose quotes and year-end backlog to XT Bookings and Backlog.
There is a portion of the G4 and AcuDose backlog that won’t convert as those customers have chosen to complete their installations with G4 or AcuDose. Customers in our year-end backlog and pipeline were prepared for a G4 installation. While we have redirected these customers to the benefits of XT and removed supply chain and paperwork issues, we assumed that these customers would move through the process as quickly as they did with G4 frames.
However, we have learned that customers want additional time to maximize their XT deployments, especially with respect to optimizing their use of XT’s additional capacity, configurations and feature benefits.
As a result of our expected conversion of our G4 and AcuDose bookings in Backlog to XT bookings, the XT manufacturing and installation ramp up we have anticipated two quarters or six months of transition disruption starting from December last year through April.
While the conversion has improved and continues to improve, we now do see some continued residual impact of these dynamics through the second quarter, i.e. through June.
Out of the total ADC Frame revenue we are expecting the percentage of XT Series Frames revenue we expect to increase from around 25% in the first quarter, to over 40% of XT revenues in the second quarter then to around 75% -- around 75% in the third quarter, and over 90% in the fourth quarter. And we will report this metric during the quarterly earnings calls this year to demonstrate the execution of the XT Series roll out and adoption.
For the first quarter, the non-GAAP revenue was $151 million within the guidance range provided in our fourth quarter results earnings call and essentially at consensus. Combined with good cost management and a tax favorability non-GAAP EPS was $0.06, and that was above our guidance range and above consensus.
In the last number of years, we've successfully grown the business by implementing three scalable growth strategies. Growth through the differentiated Omnicell platform, growth in new markets growth and growth via acquisitions. Now for 11 consecutive years, we have received the top honors from KLAS, the prestigious third-party rating organization. For 12 consecutive years, we have increased our market share and gained new thought leader customers every quarter and in almost every significant geography.

Together with our customers, we are consistently delivering state of the art medication management automation and workflow efficiency for caregivers and better healthcare outcomes for patients. Now in 2017, we continued to experience great wins and added notable customers to our Omnicell family under the first strategic pillar of Differentiated Platform.
With several large competitive conversions we estimated that we gained further market share in the first quarter of 2017, a continuation of the market share gain trend and momentum we have experienced for many years.
In the first quarter, we had some great wins with prominent new customers, as well as significant deals with existing customers including, Mercy Health Ohio, Saint Luke’s Health System and North Memorial Health. Now Mercy Health Ohio, a 23-hospital healthcare system serving Ohio and Kentucky, has selected the Company’s automated medication dispensing solutions, including the new XT Series, to be installed across their facilities.
As one of the largest health systems in the U.S., serving approximately six million patients each year, Mercy is looking for a vendor partner with technology that would streamline workflows and increase integration between the facilities. Saint Luke’s Health System, a not-for-profit healthcare system based in Kansas City, Missouri, will incorporate the Omnicell Performance Center, an integrated software and services offering to drive improved pharmacy operations and reduce costs.
Saint Luke’s Health System will incorporate Omnicell’s technology for its automated dispensing cabinets, anesthesia workstations, central pharmacy technologies and diversion detection software.
Minneapolis-based North Memorial Health has selected multiple medication management and analytics solutions for both North Memorial Health Hospital and Maple Grove Hospital, reinforcing their commitment to patient safety, while enabling each hospital to more efficiently manage medications.
North Memorial is implementing Omnicell solutions across its facilities. Products include automated carousels and controlled substance management system, Omnicell XT Automated Dispensing System with Anywhere RN, XT Anesthesia Workstation and Epic interoperability package.
With a focus on improving safety, North Memorial also selected Omnicell Analytics to gain insights into potential drug diversion activity. These strategic wins in the market place are being driven by the strength of our overall portfolio and differentiated platform.
Our second strategic pillar of expanding into new markets also fueled growth in the last several years and we believe sets us up well for growth in the coming years. Internationally, in the largest single deal for Omnicell’s IV robots outside of the United States, Invotek, our distributor for Turkey, has purchased a sizable number of Omnicell’s i.v.STATION ONCO and i.v.STATION robots. These robots are set to be installed in various hospitals providing safe, accurate and efficient IV preparation.
CompleteRx, a leading independent provider of pharmacy management and consulting services to health systems across the country, has selected Omnicell XT Series solutions to support behavior health facilities in Massachusetts. Having previously implemented Omnicell’s adherence solutions, CompleteRx looked to Omnicell to provide the latest technology, quality service and long-term products for medication automation.
Our third strategic pillar, of expanding our presence and relevance through Acquisitions, has also continued to deliver great results. The Aesynt integration is progressing well: The product portfolio integration is ahead of schedule with the market introduction of AcuDose on XT announced earlier this week, that means that current AcuDoseRx customers can add on XT equipment directly onto their system without making modifications.

The cost synergies are as expected. Already we are seeing good cross-selling momentum within the total product portfolio and combined customer base specifically for our IV and Performance Center Solutions.
In April, we completed the acquisition of InPharmics. InPharmics currently serves more than 150 hospitals with tools that analyze drug cost by patient diagnosis, thereby supporting the pharmacy’s clinical activities while helping to optimize supply chain performance and comply with drug pedigree regulations.
The InPharmics solution adds clinical and compliance analytics to our Performance Center offering, positioning Omnicell as the partner of choice for health systems looking to drive improvement across all facets of the medication management.
We believe our hard work over the years and the execution of our three-leg strategy laid the foundation for our success historically, and sets us up for continued future growth and scale.
In today’s evolving healthcare environment, we remain focused on our mission to change the practice of healthcare with solutions that improve patient and provider outcomes.
With that let, me turn it over to Peter for some financial updates.
Peter Kuipers
Thank you, Randall.
Our first quarter 2017 GAAP revenues of $151 million was down 12% from the same quarter last year and down 12.5% sequentially driven by the product transition and related ramp up of the XT Series product launch.
As Randall referred to earlier in this call, the announcement of the Omnicell XT Series does result in some disruption for two quarters, which we see continuing through the second quarter.
Earnings per share in accordance with GAAP were a loss of $0.29, which is down from a GAAP loss of $0.01 in the first quarter of 2016. GAAP gross margin was at 43% for the quarter. In addition to GAAP financial results, we report our results on a non-GAAP basis, which excludes stock compensation expense and amortization of intangible assets associated with acquisitions, one-time acquisition related expenses, and the acquisition accounting impacts related to deferred revenue, inventory fair value adjustments, and severance and other expenses related to restructuring.
We use non-GAAP financial statements in addition to GAAP financial statements because we believe it is useful for investors to understand acquisition amortization related costs and non-cash stock compensation expenses that are a component of our reported results, as well as one-time events such as the gain on Avantec investment in 2Q'15 and one-time acquisition related expenses. A full reconciliation of our GAAP to non-GAAP results is included in our first quarter earnings press release and is posted on our website.
Our first quarter 2017 non-GAAP revenues of $151 million were down 13% from the same quarter last year and down 13.6% sequentially driven by the XT Series market introduction and revenue ramp up. On a non-GAAP basis, earnings per share were $0.06 in the first quarter of 2017 above consensus and above our guidance range and down $0.29 from the same quarter last year and down $0.31 sequentially.
Non-GAAP gross margin was 46.4% in the first quarter and we expect gross margin to steadily increase through the year as the XT Series rollout ramps up and we get scale efficiencies in manufacturing and installation cost. The first quarter gross margin was also impacted by cost to expedite shipments of XT products to customers.
Non-GAAP adjusted EBITDA was $4.3 million for the first quarter of 2017. Our business is also reported in segments, consisting of Automation and Analytics and Medication Adherence. Automation and Analytics consists of our G4, AcuDose, earliergeneration, and XT Automated Dispensing Cabinets, Anesthesia Workstations, Central Pharmacy, Omnicell Supply, Omnicell Analytics and MACH4 robotic dispensing systems. Our acquisitions of Avantec, MACH4, and Aesynt are also included in this segment.

The Medication Adherence segment consists of all adherence package consumables, which are now branded SureMed, and equipment used by pharmacists to create adherence packages. Our acquisitions of MTS Medication Technologies, Surgichem and Ateb Inc are included in the Medication Adherence segment. As a reminder, we report certain corporate expenses that cannot be easily applied to either segment separately.
On a segment basis, our Automation and Analytics segment contributed $124 million in GAAP revenue in the first quarter of 2017, down from $149 million in the first quarter of 2016, driven by the start of the XT Series launch. $5 million of GAAP operating income this quarter compares to a $20 million GAAP operating income for the same quarter last year. $14 million of non-GAAP operating profit compares to $34 million last year.
The Medication Adherence segment contributed $26 million of GAAP revenue to the quarter, compared to $22 million in the first quarter of 2016. The GAAP operating loss of $2 million compares to a $3 million GAAP operating profit a year ago. Non-GAAP operating income was $1 million in the first quarter compared to $4 million of non-GAAP operating income a year ago.
The non-GAAP common expenses were $16 million compared to $17.6 million in the first quarter of 2016. The non-GAAP operating margin was around break even for the first quarter, including Aesynt and Ateb integration cost. Excluding the Aesynt and Ateb integration costs of approximately $2.7 million in the quarter, the Non-GAAP operating margin was around 1.3% for the first quarter.
In the first quarter of 2017 our cash decreased from $54 million to $46 million after paying down our term loan and revolving debt by $40 million within the quarter. The first quarter 2017 cash flow from operations of $28 million was strong and driven by strong accounts receivable collections and an increase in AP, and deferred revenue, partially offset by an inventory build-up of XT for future quarter installs.
As of March 31, 2017 we had $220 million of outstanding funded debt, and our loan leverage measured as outstanding total funded loan balance over the last 12 months of EBITDA was 2.5. Accounts receivable days sales outstanding were 82 for the first quarter, up one day from the fourth quarter despite the lower sequential sales.
For context, our standard customer agreements specify that for equipment sales the company invoices 100% of the contract value at shipment date. We review the collectability of our receivables regularly and we do not believe that the fluctuations in DSO are indicative of a change in our rate of bad debt.
Inventories at March 31, 2017 were $76 million and are up $7 million from last quarter, driven by an inventory build for future quarter installs. Our headcount was 2,361, down from 2,444 per year end driven by the reduction in force action we executed in the first quarter.
During the first quarter, we executed well on a number of drivers underpinning the dynamics of the XT Series product introduction: We converted the vast majority of all G4 and AcuDose quotes and year-end backlog to XT quotes, bookings and backlog. We have ramped up manufacturing for the XT Series after adding a second shift.
As Randall mentioned earlier, as of last week, we have delivered XT Series to approximately 175 sites and the XT Series is live at over 50 sites. Both numbers are growing every day. We executed on cost actions including a 100-position reduction in force and general hiring delays.
The majority of the reduction in force over various locations was completed in the first quarter of 2017 and also enables the creation of the Centers of Excellence to achieve cost synergies contemplated in the acquisition of Aesynt.
As part of the next phase of the integration of the acquisition of Aesynt, we are progressing well on the creation of the following Centers of Excellence, for product development, engineering and manufacturing: First the Point of Use Center of Excellence in California, the Robotics and Central Pharmacy COE in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania and lastly the Medication Adherence Consumables COE in St. Petersburg Florida.

The second through fourth quarter of 2017 dynamics are expected to be as follows; first, the AcuDose on XT launch, which we announced last week. This product launch allows the full Aesynt customer base to benefit from the XT Series product advantages while continuing to use their existing AcuDose software.
Secondly, we expect to improve XT production cost, accelerating bookings growth and accelerating organic revenue growth. During the second through fourth quarters of 2017 we are taking the following actions. We're implementing XT cost of goods sold reductions as revenue ramps. We continued cost controls and we're implementing the COEs mentioned earlier.
Although the first quarter bookings were ahead of our internal plan as Randall mentioned, we do see some continued disruption impact on revenue of the ramp up of the XT Series product introduction in the full second quarter. We do believe that there will be a partial catch up of these customer deployment and configuration installation timing delays on revenue in the second half of the year but not a full catch up.
As a result, for the second quarter of 2017, we expect non-GAAP revenue to be between $172 million and $178 million. We expect the second quarter of 2017 non-GAAP earnings to be between $0.21 and $0.27 per share.
As discussed in previous earnings calls, it’s important to note that from time to time installation completion timing on specifically bigger projects can impact revenue and earnings in a given quarter, but we don’t expect such quarterly fluctuations to impact the growth rate measured over multiple quarters.
For the second half of 2017, we expect total non-GAAP revenue to be between $395 million and $415 million, representing an approximate12% organic revenue growth rate when using the midpoint.
For the second half of 2017, we expect total non-GAAP earnings to be between $0.95 and $1.05 per share. This represents a $2 per share non-GAAP EPS run-rate when annualizing the second half of 2017 using the midpoint of the guidance range. Although the first quarter bookings were ahead of the internal plan at this time we are not updating our product bookings guidance, and we continue to expect the 2017 product bookings to be between $570 million and $590 million.
We expect non-GAAP revenue to be between $720 million and $740 million for total 2017 and we expect 2017 non-GAAP earnings to be between $1.22 and $1.34 per share as we are offsetting part of the lower guided revenue range with cost actions and efficiencies.
We expect non-GAAP operating margins for 2017 to be approximately 10%, including integration cost for Aesynt and Ateb. Excluding the integration cost for the Aesynt and Ateb, we expect non-GAAP operating margin for 2017 to be between 11% and 11.5%.
Given the ramp up of the XT Series revenue and profitability through the year in 2017 described earlier in this call, we expect the non-GAAP margin for the fourth quarter in 2017 including integration cost for Aesynt and Ateb to be at approximately between 15% to 16%, in line with our long-term financial model.
Excluding the integration cost for Aesynt and Ateb, we expect the non-GAAP operating margin for the fourth quarter in 2017 to be above 16%.
When reviewing 2017, it's important to note a couple of items included in the 2017 guidance: First of all, for 2017, our non-GAAP expected results include approximately $12 million of integration costs for Aesynt and Ateb that we do not adjust for based on our non-GAAP policy.
These integration costs directly impacting non-GAAP operating margins and non-GAAP EPS mostly consist of integration related IT expenses, integration team and project cost, cost related to the implementation of Sarbanes Oxley, cost related to tax restructuring and accelerated product development integration costs.

In 2017, we are expecting second year cost synergies of around $10 million. As we have demonstrated in the past we are confident to achieve our 15% non-GAAP operating margin target over time after integrating the acquired business and getting full benefit of the scale of the combined business.
Lastly, for 2017, we expect interest expense related to the senior secured credit facility used to finance the Aesynt and Ateb acquisitions to be around $7 million or equivalent to a non-GAAP EPS headwind of around $0.11.
Finally, we're assuming an annual average effective tax rate of 35% on GAAP earnings on a combined basis.
To round on our update, I'll hand the call back to Randall.
Randall Lipps
Thanks Peter. Just in quick summary, we continue to win in the market place. And I want to make it clear that we talk a lot about XT, but as we approach our customers, we’re not just talking about the difference that XT makes, we’re talking about our entire platform.
And as we’ve seen, the cost of the pharmacy operations for providers make substantially over the last few years, and many of the years double-digit growth. In fact, the single growing item, line item in the provider network.
We’ve seen pharmacy medication management move from more of a tactical concern to a strategic approach for these facilities. So, when we go in and discuss with either new or existing customer, we're talking about a strategy over the next four to five years to take that customer and digitize all of their manual processes and then be able to rationalize it our offerings like the Performance Center and also address areas of automation like IV, which are significant costs for the institution and of course XT is part of that -- a big part of the platform.
But the conversations that we’re having are very strategic, they’re very long-term oriented, and they’re about optimizing the movement of drugs across a multiplicity of sites and the whole continuum of care with many of these provider networks having their own insurance program for their own employees as a test of population health, which dovetails right in with our medication adherence product offering.
So, we have this total broad-based solution set that resonates with where these provider networks are and where they’re going and of course, the XT is the big financial piece that we talk a lot about, but the whole platform has become a strategic sale that impacts customers for the long term and we’re really excited as we bring this almost new broad platform with Aesynt and the XT series that we've been able to add has just changed the discussion. And then as we move forward, it is why we’re winning in the market place.
So, with that, I'll finish our prepared remarks and turn it over for questions. Operator, can you help us out there?
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
[Operator instructions] Your first question comes from the line of Jamie Stockton with Wells Fargo.
Jamie Stockton
Hey. Good morning. Thanks for taking my questions. I guess maybe the first one Randy, I assume the answer to this is going to be that it's negligible, but BD was talking about changes that they're making to the way that they account for Pyxis. They indicated that there wasn’t going to be a change in kind of the cash flow payment from their customers.
So, I assume that there is not going to be any impact in the marketplace from what they're doing but can you confirm that?
Randall Lipps
Yeah, I think that the customers are picking us because we have the best product in the marketplace, the broadest platform. We have the best technology. We have the best customer experience, the best in-stall experience. We have the best integration experience.
So, when you put all these things together, customers need to make choices that are going to take them to the place they need to go in order to be successful with medication management and cost and the way you finance the price for all these types of equipment is important, but I wouldn't say it is the issue that makes someone choose us or not choose us.

We aren’t the cheapest, but we are the best and as I said in just my last remarks, people are choosing strategic ways making sure they can manage the future not a financing vehicle I guess and I would also say that most of the market has moved away from continuous payment.
10 years ago, 80% of the market was getting some kind of financial construct from their vendor. Today two thirds of the market either purchases their product direct or uses -- the financial institution uses their own banking or financing vehicle to buy equipment because they are so large, they have the leverage and they don't need financing from a vendor.
So, I think it's counter to what the industry has moved to and I think that many of the things that we do have changed the marketplace. For instance, you pay for our service and you get consistent software upgrades for free, but it comes with the service. You don't have to -- you have to pay some big amount every year in order to get those.
That's built into our business model. That's hard to compete with and that's because our systems are back to compatible and the software integrates and allows people to continuously improve the medication med platform without having a large amount of disruption. A long answer to your question, but yes, I don't see any slowdown in our momentum in the marketplace because of that.
Jamie Stockton
Okay. That's great. And then maybe just two quick other ones, I'll get out both to you at the same time, services seem to be pretty stronger in the quarter. Any more color on what's going on there and then in the medication adherence business, it looks like OpEx was pretty high and it really hit the bottom line of that segment. Can you give us any more color on what's happening there?
Peter Kuipers
So, Jamie, this is Peter. So, what you see there really from a sequential perspective is really the full quarter impact of the Ateb acquisition, the leading software provider that we required in December. Most of that revenue is service revenue and you see the OpEx falling back for the first quarter here in the segment. So that's mostly Ateb.
Jamie Stockton
Both issues, both are stronger service revenue and also the impact on medication adherence profitability was…
Peter Kuipers
Yes, that's included in that segment yes.
Jamie Stockton
That's great. Thank you.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Mohan Naidu with Oppenheimermy.
Mohan Naidu
Thanks for taking my questions. Randy, going back to your booking comments, can you comment on your win rate? Has XT influencing your win rate so far for you guys?
Randall Lipps
Yeah, I would say that XT is -- as customers look at particularly whether it's a new competitive conversion, they want to get on the front end of the new cycle of technology that's the base technology for the entire platform.
So, it's more of a compelling reason I think to go with us as well as new customers, I mean existing customers who are looking to make big strategic moves like St. Luke's. That was an existing customer I think it's over 12 hospitals. They had the AcuDose system. They didn't -- they weren’t required to upgrade all their AcuDose systems to XT, but they did.
But they didn't just but XT, that wasn’t the driving force behind the transaction. It was the fact that they were going to take Performance Center. They were going to reduce some workflow processing in their pharmacy and put a whole strategy of deploying this over the next few years to make this a much more effective process and system and integrate it with their epic system in a lot deeper fashion.
So those were the driving decision points that made a current customer retire current equipment that was aged, but still useful but moved to XT.
Mohan Naidu
Got it. Got it. On the revenue guidance cut, just want to dig in a little bit there, is it the primary -- I guess the primary cause of that, is it that implementations that customers are getting delayed or getting elongated because customers want to extend, or why is the delay even though you have the inventory in hand right now?

Randall Lipps
Well we had three reasons for the delay previously. One was manufacturing constraint, paperwork had to be re-papered for the XT model numbers and as well that also included the configuration. Now we've gotten through most of that but as we got to the very end and even had -- we have no manufacturing constraints and we have some paperwork constraints.
But the main issue is that hospitals that were taking G4 have agreed to take XT and have XT maybe even sitting at their sites are looking at reconfiguring XT and redeploying it in a different fashion because of the different options we offer with XT that G4 was not able to offer.
Those additional loops if you will of consideration have caused us to push out some of the XT revenue from Q2 to the second half of the year, but as we get through June almost all of that is gone and by the end of the year, all we're shipping is XT and most of the orders that in the second half of the year they're coming out of our backlog more and more those orders will have originated as original XT orders and the customer would've been sold and configured originally in XT and not G4.
So, we don't have those disruption issues are negligible as we get toward the end of June or very little as we move past June and your -- all your backlog that you have that you're installing is really just coming out of pure originated XT product.
Mohan Naidu
Got you. One last question, on the revenue guidance for the second half of the year with 20% plus growth, how much visibility do you have on that I guess -- is that -- do you have enough visibility right now that you have enough XT coming in that you can do that growth right now?
Peter Kuipers
Yes, so the 20% is bookings right and then the 12% is revenue. So, we have bottom of rollup from installation perspective that we feel confident in specifically the third quarter revenue build up and then we've got some good visibility in the fourth quarter as well, but then of course because of that as you move through the quarters, as far bookings we feel very confident.
We noted, both Randall and I noticed that we're ahead for bookings for the first quarter for our internal plan. So, we do have the bookings, it's just a matter of the year, the final config and installation timing. So, we feel good about the total momentum of the business and we're winning in the marketplace.
Randall Lipps
We feel very confident about second half of the year and particularly the third quarter, just because we -- even if we had some issues, we now have enough to maneuvering room with enough customers to try to install on a regular more consistent basis to get back to our revenue that we should have flowing through the company on a consistent basis.
Mohan Naidu
That's great. Thank you very much for taking my question.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Matt Hewitt with Craig-Hallum Capital.
Matt Hewitt
Good morning, gentlemen and thank you for the update and congratulations on the progress with XT.
Randall Lipps
Thank you.
Matt Hewitt
A couple questions, first I am trying to understand the delta in the adjusted earnings guidance this morning, so you just beat with Q1, you indicated in your prepared remarks that gross margins are expected to ramp over the course of the year, which I would think would offset some of the change in the revenue guidance. What's the delta that we're missing, or that I am missing with EPS?
Peter Kuipers
Yes, let me walk you through. So, in the plan of course in the original guidance, we also assumed like you can see in the earlier earnings call, we assumed an increase or improvement to the gross margin as we scale and get efficiencies both from a cost reduction perspective and supply chain and overhead cost absorption.

So that path that trend hasn't changed. Let me walk you high level from the guidance that we gave before, so the midpoint of the guidance that we gave before was $750 million of revenue and the midpoint of EPS was $1.37. We lowered the revenue guidance in the midpoint by $20 million, which equates to roughly $0.16 down.
So, it will be at $1.21 but then we have additional cost actions of about $0.07 getting us to roughly a $1.28 midpoint.
Matt Hewitt
Okay. Thank you. And then regarding the bookings growth, 20% or over 20% in the second half of the year, historically, on your conference calls you've talked about how bookings translates into revenues within a six to nine-month period and I'm curious as we look out to 2018 and I'm not asking for guidance necessarily, but historically you've talked about that trend in revenues.
So, if you got over 20% bookings growth in the back half of this year, that would imply over 20% revenue growth in the second half of '18. Does that historical patterns still hold?
Peter Kuipers
Well in general, it does because of the math as well right. So, if you look at our revenue guidance for the second half, you're looking at the $200 million revenue quarters there right. So, it means that we'll use some of the backlog that we've build up as well in the last couple of months and some of the bookings in the third quarter will turn into revenue in the last month of the third quarter and then also in the fourth quarter. So, it's not for one but definitely it's a growing trend.
Randall Lipps
Yeah 8 to 12 is historically where we've been and I think that's a good way to look at business even though we're not giving any specific guidance for next year and I think we also have some really cool products that are recognized ratably. They're not recognizable once like for performance center, the SaaS model.
Some of the IV deployments that we're doing or the rise model are recognized ratably. So, good profitable growth, but it doesn't flow out of backlog as quick. So, I think the way we're looking, the way that we've traditionally looked at the business in a healthy format, the 8 to 12 is always a good way to look at the business as well as we do -- we are seeing a really nice pipeline growing of replacements.
This is the new market we have not had. A lot of that's toward the back of the end of the year because we just introduced XT in December, but we've already had some nice sales that we would not had if we didn't have XT and that's only going to grow as we move forward and give time for customers to get into their budgets and their pipeline for the year. So, we should feel confident about the 8 to 12 over the long run.
Matt Hewitt
Okay. Great. And one last one for me and then I'll hop back in the queue, can we get an update on the performance center, may be the number of customers that have implemented or contracted? Obviously, there was strong growth right out of the gates with the first quarter, but if we can get an update where you are today that would be helpful.
Randall Lipps
Well, I would just say that we had record bookings of performance center in Q1. It was a key piece of technology and service integrated into almost many of our large single orders that we had this quarter. We are progressing very quickly because it is becoming a key driver in the total platform sale.
I know we're -- I don't know the exact number and I actually know the exact number of customer, but it's not single digits or anything but I think what's most exciting is that we thought that this would be more of an aftermarket sale after people had deployed their technology and its now part of the upfront sale in a major conversion or major new cycle of products.
Matt Hewitt
Okay. Great. Thank you.
Operator

Your next question comes from the line of Sean Wieland with Piper Jaffray.
Sean Wieland
Thank you. Good morning. Can you give us some examples of how a customer is looking to redeploy XP in a different fashion than G4 and how many -- exactly how many customers are rethinking their deployment in this way?
Randall Lipps
Well, there's a couple of things. One is that when you reconfigure the XT you have a lot more options to more meds to more locations and when you move more meds to more locations you might move from 60% of the meds flowing through the systems and 40% flowing from the pharmacy to get a 100% flow up the floor.
Now the expanded capacity without changing the footprint, you can move to 80% to 90% of the workflow up to what's called a cart less format and most of the hospitals that have not been in this format, have had physical constraints on the space of the product.
And so, this is a big change in workflow because now nursing will spend more time getting the drugs out of the system instead of having it delivered to them the 40% delivered from the pharmacy on a per patient basis.
So now when you move to 80% to 90%, you deploy different software features, different policies, you change the workflow of the pharmacy on how often it's delivered up to the floors and then you drive nursing to do more of their activity like anywhere we're in directly through the system to prep their orders coming out of the automated dispensing and using it as a single point of operation as opposed to just a 50% to 60% workflow.
Sean Wieland
So, would you characterize it as most of the G4 to XT conversions are going through this kind of workflow change or dial it into a number of percentage?
Randall Lipps
Well, that's probably the primary issue is just configuration because there isn’t a good one to one transfer or one drawer on the G4. It looks like one drawer on the XT. There is such significant difference that it does require some decision-making.
There also some other XT issues in California. You have to have OSHPD recertified, your earthquake plate on some new construction. So, the G4 earthquake plate is already approved but the XT is approved from the Omnicell side but the hospital now has to go get its approval for the XT earthquake plate.
So again, that's only because of XT, it's not because if it was a G4 kind of deal it would go through and wouldn't be a problem and even though there was extended time for the XT to get through some of these things, there's just enough of these things that have pushed enough of the installs into the second half of the year that we were hoping to getting done in Q2.
Sean Wieland
All right, that's super helpful. Just one more clarification. So that 25% in Q1 to 40% to 75% to 90% as you laid out, tell me again exactly what those numbers represent?
Randall Lipps
That's just the -- if you look at the ADC installations dispensing systems, C4 and XT, so in Q1 just of the ADC installations, 75% were G4, 25% were XT. As we move to the second quarter, 40% will be XT and 60% will be G4 and then we believe 75% and then first deal XT revenues essentially basically by the end of the year everything is pretty much XT.
Sean Wieland
Okay. One more. What percentage of XT shipments today so far have been to replace G4 versus replace AcuDose versus net new?
Randall Lipps
Well I think -- well I don't know about the shipments, but on the booking side, I would say we've built a very healthy line and I think that we see that customers are excited about moving forward with XT, the large customers especially are looking places to deploy XT, so they can get a good understanding of it, so that as they prepare the budgets in the following years, they know how they want to deploy it and how they want to change the configuration of those things.

I haven't had any customer say well I'm not going to go to XT eventually or I don't want to go to XT eventually. It's just about matters of time and if you just look at the numbers, the numbers and the size of our installed base or take AcuDose, that's a third of our installed base.
They probably had more of an urgency to switch to XT because they know that their AcuDose is going to be form factor is going to be sun setting there quickly and probably knew that since the acquisition a year ago.
Sean Wieland
Okay. But my question was what percentage of the bookings, XT bookings have been to replace to upgrade AcuDose versus upgrade G4 versus net new customers?
Randall Lipps
Okay. Didn't listen very well. I think that probably more than half have been AcuDose and that when I'm talking about replacements less on the Omnicell side and then 40% on Omnicell and then probably from this date going forward, there is very little new G4 orders.
We still have that line going, but most of the G4 that's being installed has already been built and it's about to be shipped to customers for Q2 and Q3. So that product line is not very large on the manufacturing side.
Sean Wieland
Okay. Thank you for taking all my questions.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Raymond Myers with Benchmark.
Raymond Myers
Great. Thank you. And Randy I want to continue on previous questions enough savings that we're receiving with Performance Center. Can you discuss what that is and you have experienced what the recent trend has been.
Randall Lipps
I think there is a nice ROI if you look at it just from the ROI of the cost rational of that rationalization of medication inventories across many multi-site, we say a minimum of 2% of the entire pharmacy spend is continuing in that fashion, but there are other things that we are adding to the Performance Center that continue to help meet regulatory compliance and save cost along 340 B.
This new pedigree thing from Pharmex is all about regulatory compliance and so there's -- by having the Performance Center platform not only help save rationalize cost, optimize the use and workflow of the system on a real-time basis, but the ability to meet the new regulatory regulations without massive amounts across the deploying complex systems and to continue to deploy 340 B, which is a huge cost saver for these institutions is another reason that people have gone with the Performance Center.
Raymond Myers
Okay. Sounds great. And then to be clear, the timing of your XT disruption I believe you're exiting now through June from April. So just two months. Is that the primary reason for the adjustment in full year revenue guidance or are there other factors as well?
Randall Lipps
That's the whole reason. It's just the XT launch because of the change in what additional requirements that some XT sites are requiring either through configuration or certification or different cycles of approval, even though it's the same software IT may want to have to go in a look at it again and verify Windows 10 because XT runs on Windows 10.
So, there's just these extra additional steps that don't have anything to do with manufacturing constraints, don't have anything to do with paperwork constraints, but do have to do with it's a new model and its landing on site and before you can install it, we want to have some extra reviews of the product or actions.
Peter Kuipers
So, to summarize, so we have the bookings. We had our internal plan for the first quarter on bookings. It's really a matter of timing that those bookings, which are non-cancelable commitments or further into revenue fee and installation and to summarize it Randy said, we see because it's a new product that customers want to make sure they optimize all the additional benefits that the XT series has and that takes a little bit more time than we initially had thought.

Raymond Myers
Okay. Understood. Last question is on the IV robots, can you discuss the customer adoption of that and has your view changed about the potential for the product over the next few years?
Randall Lipps
No, it's only getting more exciting. I think what we see in the IV robotics is still an emerging-market but the more we deploy, the more local markets go by and see somebody else's robot and then want to move toward that and I think we see big good success there.
We've owned Aesynt for about a year, a little more than a longer in a year, that was a new product to add to our sales persons bag and now we're seeing the results of that product as the pipeline has been built up over the year and now it's coming out of the funnel as new sales.
So that's a very exciting product and between Performance Center and IV those tend to be incorporated in all our new or larger sales in almost every case and we have a lot of individual hospitals making singular purchases of our IV system and that is resulting in first time business relationships with a lot of new customers that we've never had before.
Raymond Myers
That's great. Thanks Randy and Peter.
Randall Lipps
Because we're the market leader obviously.
Operator
Your final question comes from the line of Gene Mannheimer with Dougherty & Company.
Gene Mannheimer
Thanks, and good morning.
Randall Lipps
Hey Gene.
Gene Mannheimer
Question is I guess how long in the future will you be continuing to support assuming a long quarters you're still getting installed there and how much of the G3 phase of the folks that never migrated over to G4 are candidates to XT, some numbers around that would be great?
Randall Lipps
Yeah, I think just the matter of getting our gross margin back to where it needs to be will require us to consolidate to a single line of automated dispensing and as you see the XT getting to 90% by the end of the year, I think that points to a roadmap that says G4 and the AcuDose have pretty short fuses on it this year before that's all we ship for either customer base.
And then I think in the G3 world, we're already addressing those sites as we've launched the XT, we are asking those sites to move quickly along and a lot of those most likely will move directly from the G3 to XT.
Gene Mannheimer
So, there are about 100 of those or give us a sense of maybe the magnitude of that?
Randall Lipps
It's not -- I don't think it's more than 10% of our -- a little bit I am guessing less than 10% of our installed base, but it is probably a significant number when you add up all the units we have out there, but as far as the percentage of our customer base it’s not that big.
Gene Mannheimer
Got you and secondly, Randy or Peter, what was the Ateb contribution in the quarter and would medication adherence have grown on an organic basis net of that?
Randall Lipps
It's about $30 million, we guided last year and when we did the acquisition, it was about a $30 million business. So, I think we said $28 million. So, we find that about $4 million, I think it's about $7 million for the quarter assuming it's a fairly -- it's a lot of service right, software.
So, it's ratably over times about between $6 million and $7 million, I would say for this quarter if you carve that out, you can calculate the percentage.
Gene Mannheimer
Okay. Very good. Thanks guys and happy birthday Randy.
Randall Lipps
Oh. Thank you. Thank you, Gene and finally I just want to close and say that look this XT thing is we haven't done as good job of rolling thing out or predicting how we roll out as we thought, but we're coming to the end of these issues and that is the only issue that is disrupting any of our business that we have going on here.
I think on the other side of the booking side of the business, we are winning major deals in every geographic market in the U.S. and every time you do want to that it just creates more momentum for the company. When you when WellStar in Georgia, every Georgia by the end wants to know why are people moving to WellStar and so why are they moving to Omnicell.

So, the company has significant momentum in the marketplace. The XT series having the best products, the broadest product lines, these things continue to set us up for some fantastic growth and even to the point where we see these provider networks looking at med adherence and taking some of our med adherence products and bring that into the product offering for these folks as they try to improve the outcomes for patients.
It's really satisfying to see the impact that we are making in the lives of patients and the way that providers can key into that success.
Again, thanks for joining us and again just want to continue to shout out the employee base it's an acquisition XT rollout. Everybody is running pretty hard and I just want to thank you for your great efforts and great results. We'll see you guys next time.
Operator
Thank you. That concludes today's conference call. You may now disconnect.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Technology, Computer Based Systems, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All OMCL TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksThe Long Case For AppleAAPL• Today, 7:05 AM • Andres Cardenal, CFA•38 CommentsTwilio: Silver Lining In The CloudsTWLO• Today, 6:23 AM • Alpha Securities•8 CommentsMicrosoft: Post-Earnings AnalysisMSFT• Today, 6:09 AM • Roman Luzgin•8 CommentsApple Reportedly Funds Automotive Battery ResearchAAPL• Yesterday, 11:27 PM • Mark Hibben•29 CommentsThere's Not Much To Not Like About Microsoft HereMSFT• Yesterday, 6:38 PM • James Brumley•25 CommentsBillion-Dollar Unicorns: DraftKings Faces HurdlesDRAFT• Yesterday, 6:20 PM • Sramana MitraSnap's Farce: The Equity Incentive PlanSNAP• Yesterday, 6:17 PM • Whestuizen•87 CommentsSemiconductor ETFs To Roar Higher As Q2 Earnings UnfoldSOXX, SMH, PSI• Yesterday, 4:00 PM • Zacks FundsThe Short Case For WelbiltEditors' Pick • WBT• Yesterday, 4:00 PM • Rational Short Investor•1 CommentIBM: Don't Get Caught In A Value TrapIBM• Yesterday, 3:39 PM • Bank On Insight•17 CommentsNew Chance To Buy Into Shares Of Tintri At IPO Quiet Period ExpirationTNTR• Yesterday, 2:53 PM • Don Dion•1 CommentMicrosoft: A Great Dividend Growth Stock To ConsiderMSFT• Yesterday, 2:24 PM • Ploutos Investing•30 CommentsAMD To Easily Beat Revenue EstimatesAMD• Yesterday, 1:22 PM • Earnings Forecast Focus•92 CommentsStrong Product Rollout Suggests AMD Will Likely Raise Q3 GuidanceAMD• Yesterday, 12:32 PM • EnerTuition•46 CommentsA Thoughtful Investment With Help From Baidu BrainBIDU• Yesterday, 12:16 PM • Tobias Beith•5 CommentsHow BlackBerry Can Quickly Increase Its Software RevenueBBRY• Yesterday, 11:47 AM • Motek Moyen•64 CommentsEarnings Watch: What Will Boost Facebook?FB• Yesterday, 11:33 AM • Feria Investor•20 CommentsKey Lessons From Facebook And WWE SpeculationFB• Yesterday, 11:26 AM • Gary Bourgeault•2 CommentsWhy You Should Sell Amazon After Its Next Earnings ReleaseAMZN• Yesterday, 11:09 AM • Robert Riesen•51 CommentsMicrosoft Keeps Performing Very Well - But Don't Get FooledMSFT• Yesterday, 11:08 AM • Jonathan Weber•24 CommentsSkyworks: Another Home RunSWKS• Yesterday, 10:57 AM • Kumquat Research•15 CommentsDump Cincinnati Bell On 2 Terrible AcquisitionsEditors' Pick • CBB, HCOM• Yesterday, 10:39 AM • John Zhang•3 CommentsAmazon Acts Against Its Greatest ThreatAMZN• Yesterday, 10:34 AM • David Pinsen•57 CommentsMicrosoft First Look: Beyond My ExpectationsMSFT• Yesterday, 9:18 AM • D.M. Martins Research•18 CommentsVirtusa Corp. Is Completing Its Bottom, Now It Could Break OutVRTU• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • John LongsworthQuickLogic: Pre-Q2 2017 Results - Accumulate OpportunisticallyQUIK• Yesterday, 8:39 AM • Jay Deahna•3 CommentsWhen Divorce Becomes Inevitable: Preserve Capital And Grow IncomeIRM• Yesterday, 8:00 AM • George Schneider•66 CommentsAT&T: Oversold, Unloved, And Poised To PopT• Yesterday, 8:00 AM • David Alton Clark•66 CommentsWatch Jeff Bezos's Drone-Shot Preview Of Blue Origin's New FactoryAMZN• Yesterday, 7:49 AM • SA News TeamYou Should Own Facebook Despite These 3 RisksFB• Yesterday, 1:17 AM • First Floor Finance•23 CommentsRed Hat: The Next Cloud GiantRHT• Thu, Jul. 20, 6:49 PM • Prasanna Rajagopal•2 CommentsAMD Vega Is StillbornAMD• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:40 PM • Paulo Santos•319 CommentsIngenico (INGIY) Acquires Bambonra - SlideshowINGIY• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:04 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Short Case For HubspotEditors' Pick • HUBS• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:00 PM • Short Biased•3 CommentsAVX (AVX) Acquires The Transportation, Sensing, & Control Division Of TT Electronics PLC - SlideshowAVX• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:54 PM • SA TranscriptsCohu Has A Compelling Turnaround Growth Story That You Need To KnowCOHU• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:51 PM • Shark Traders•1 CommentAMD, Nvidia, Intel: A Trio ValuationAMD, INTC, NVDA• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:28 PM • Kwan-Chen Ma•136 CommentsMicron: Valuation Reveals UpsideMU• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:34 PM • Focus Equity•26 CommentsMassRoots: Riding The Cannabis WaveMSRT• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:15 PM • Stone Fox Capital•13 CommentsMicron And Intel: The AI And Security Play Of The CenturyEditors' Pick • MU• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:13 PM • Stephen Breezy•190 CommentsMicrosoft Earnings Set To InspireMSFT• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:56 PM • Feria Investor•5 CommentsDeNA (DNACF) Investor Presentation - SlideshowDNACF• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:52 PM • SA TranscriptsIs The Writing On The Wall For Micron?MU• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:39 PM • Shareholders Unite•43 CommentsAMD: The Catalyst No One Is Talking AboutAMD• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:35 PM • Kumquat Research•79 CommentsIntel Is A Solid Buy At Current LevelsINTC• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:33 PM • Roman Luzgin•21 CommentsFocused The Present, Not Dreaming The Future - Why Zynga Canned Mafia WarsZNGA• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:28 PM • Jonathan Jordan•15 CommentsMicrosoft Earnings: A Look At What Might Be Expected For Fiscal Q4MSFT• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:59 PM • JJ Kinahan•1 CommentDon't Get Fooled By IBMIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:41 PM • Jonathan Weber•22 CommentsSalesforce.com: Market Dominance Is Not The Best Investment CriterionCRM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:39 PM • Beulah Meriam K•6 CommentsCorning Acquires SpiderCloud Wireless For In-Building TechnologyGLW• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:39 PM • Donovan Jones•5 CommentsEarnings Watch: Apple & The U.S. DollarAAPL• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:30 PM • Feria Investor•40 CommentsActivision Blizzard: Great Buying OpportunityATVI• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:27 PM • Roman Luzgin•26 CommentsRevenues Aren't The Only Thing Falling At IBMIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:01 PM • Marshall Thomas•13 CommentsIBM: How Long Until I Should Throw In The Towel?IBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:44 AM • Nicholas Ward•113 CommentsWhy Intel Said Sayonara To Smart Devices & WearablesINTC• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:42 AM • Motek Moyen•27 CommentsNokia: Tricky Trade, Still Bullish Long-TermNOK• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:33 AM • D.M. Martins Research•21 CommentsIntel And IBM Making Nvidia Their Breakfast SandwichIBM, INTC, NVDA• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:20 AM • Right Angle•5 CommentsPositioning For AT&T EarningsT• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:44 AM • Josh Arnold•15 CommentsIBM: A Perma-Bear ReassessesIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:27 AM • DoctoRx•38 CommentsAT&T Keeps Taking Out New LowsT• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:15 AM • Jonathan Weber•64 CommentsRogers Communications Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRCI• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:11 AM • SA TranscriptsSamsung Is Very Well Placed To Boom From An Increased Demand For Computer ChipsSSNLF• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:49 AM • Matt Bohlsen•13 CommentsPlexus Corp. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPLXS• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:28 AM • SA TranscriptsCamtek: Why We Sold Our PCB ActivityCAMT• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:06 AM • Camtek Ltd.•3 CommentsBaidu - Autonomous Driving As A Free OptionBIDU• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:49 AM • Kenra InvestorsSAP AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSAP• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:46 AM • SA TranscriptsPotential Multibaggers Pt.3: Momo Has MojoMOMO• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:07 AM • From Growth to Value•26 CommentsWhatsApp Goes Spotty In China, Headed For Shutout?FB• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:04 AM • Doug Young•11 CommentsOptimism Returns To Super Micro Computer StockSMCI• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:48 AM • Shareholders Unite•5 CommentsAdding Intel In 2017INTC• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:38 AM • The Money Madam•11 CommentsApple Becomes A Little Less SecretiveAAPL• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:39 AM • Mark Hibben•46 Comments58.Com: A Secular Growth StoryWUBA• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:26 PM • ONeil Trader•3 CommentsQualcomm Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesQCOM• Wed, Jul. 19, 7:42 PM • SA Transcripts•29 CommentsBenchmark Electronics Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBHE• Wed, Jul. 19, 7:29 PM • SA TranscriptsFrontier Communications Is UninvestableFTR• Wed, Jul. 19, 5:10 PM • Bank On Insight•78 Comments123456...1160Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Vodafone Group's (VOD) CEO Vittorio Colao on Q1 2018 Trading Update Conference Call (Transcript)


VOD•
      Sat, Jul. 22,  5:03 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Metso Corporation's (MXTOF) CEO Matti Kähkönen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MXTOF•
      Sat, Jul. 22, 12:08 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ingenico Group's (INGIF) CEO Philippe Lazare on Acquisition of Bambora & Q2 2017 Trading Update (Transcript)


INGIF•
      Fri, Jul. 21, 10:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Danske Bank's (DNSKF) CEO Thomas Borgen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DNSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cinedigm (CIDM) Cinedigm Bison Agreement Conference (Transcript)


CIDM•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Western Alliance Bancorporation's (WAL) CEO Robert Sarver on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WAL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Mobile Mini's (MINI) CEO Erik Olsson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MINI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:55 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Givaudan's (GVDNY) CEO Gilles Andrier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GVDNY•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MB Financial's (MBFI) CEO Mitchell Feiger on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MBFI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cementos Pacasmayo's (CPAC) CEO Humberto Nadal on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPAC•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sensient Technologies' (SXT) CEO Paul Manning on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SXT•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Moody's (MCO) CEO Raymond McDaniel on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MCO•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Regions Financial's (RF) CEO Grayson Hall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Accell Group (ACGPF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACGPF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:52 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Del Frisco's Restaurant Group's (DFRG) CEO Norman Abdallah on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFRG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Volaris Aviation's (VLRS) CEO Enrique Beltranena on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VLRS•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Colgate-Palmolive's (CL) CEO Ian Cook on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



McClatchy's (MNI) CEO Craig Forman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MNI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:42 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Badger Meter's (BMI) CEO Rich Meeusen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BMI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




OFG Bancorp's (OFG) CEO Jose Rafael Fernandez on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




General Electric's (GE) CEO Jeff Immelt on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GE•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:24 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•15 Comments 



Husky's (HUSKF) CEO Rob Peabody on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Glacier Bancorp's (GBCI) CEO Randall Chesler on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GBCI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Honeywell International's (HON) CEO Darius Adamczyk on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HON•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:15 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



CoBiz Financial's (COBZ) CEO Steve Bangert on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


COBZ•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ameris Bancorp's (ABCB) CEO Edwin Hortman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ABCB•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:46 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Banco Latinoamericano De Comercio Exterior's (BLX) CEO Rubens Amaral On Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BLX•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Citizens Financial Group's (CFG) CEO Bruce Van Saun on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Kansas City Southern's (KSU) CEO Patrick Ottensmeyer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KSU•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Huntington Bancshares' (HBAN) CEO Steve Steinour on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HBAN•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  2:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 




123456...4430Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 

































Randall A. Lipps - Invuity





















































Home
About

Management Team
Board of Directors
Careers
Invuity University


Technology

Evidence


Products

Retractors

Eikon®
Eika®
Eipex®
Eivector®
Breiten®


Handhelds

PhotonSaber™ Y
PhotonSaber™ F


Drop-Ins

PhotonGuide™ XT


PhotonBlade™
Document Library


Procedures

Breast Surgery
Spine Surgery
Orthopedic Surgery
Thyroid Surgery
Additional Applications


Programs
Investors & Media

Press Releases
SEC Filings
Events & Presentations
Corporate Governance
Investors FAQ
Stock Information
Information Request
Email Alerts


Request Info






















                Randall A. Lipps            







InvuityAboutBoard of DirectorsRandall A. Lipps 









CEO, Chairman and Founder Omnicell, Inc.
Randall A. Lipps has served as a member of our board of directors since June 2013. In September 1992, Mr. Lipps founded Omnicell, a publicly traded automated healthcare solutions company, and has served as its Chairman of the Board since that time and as its President and Chief Executive Officer since October 2002. From 1989 to 1992, Mr. Lipps served as the Senior Vice President of ST Holdings, a travel and marketing company. From 1987 to 1989, he served as Assistant Vice President of Sales and Operations for a subsidiary of AMR, the parent company of American Airlines. Mr. Lipps received both a B.S. in economics and a B.B.A. from Southern Methodist University. We believe Mr. Lipps is qualified to serve on our board of directors because of his management and operational experience in the healthcare industry.














Contact Form


First Name *


Last Name *




Company


Phone




Email *


Country *




City *


State *


Zip *






Job Role*
--None--Surgeon
Administrator
OR Staff
Materials Management
Hospital Executive
Distributor
Other



Specialty*
--None--
Cardiac
Colorectal
General
GYN
Neuro
Oral Surgery
Orthopedics
Otolaryngology
Plastic and Reconstructive
Thoracic
Transplant
Urology
Vascular





Primary Product Interest
--None--
Breiten® Illuminated Retractor System
Eiberg® Illuminated Retractor System
Eika® Retractors
Eikon® Illuminated Retractor System
Eikon® LT Illuminated Retractor System
Eipex® Retractors
Eivector® Retractors
Fiber Optic Cables
Instrument Sterilization Tray
PhotonSaber™ F 
PhotonSaber™ Y 
PhotonGuide™ XT
PhotonBlade™
PhotonVue™





Comments








Contact Us
Invuity, Inc.
444 De Haro Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
 415-655-2100
Customer Service
 866-711-7768
 888-614-8954
 
×







 







WordPress Download Manager - Best Download Management Plugin


Close


















Omnicell's (OMCL) CEO Randall Lipps on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Omnicell's (OMCL) CEO Randall Lipps on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptFeb.15.17 | About: Omnicell, Inc. (OMCL) Omnicell, Inc. (NASDAQ:OMCL)
Q4 2016 Earnings Conference Call
February 15, 2017 4:30 pm ET
Executives
Randall Lipps - Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer and Founder
Peter Kuipers - Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Analysts
Matt Hewitt - Craig-Hallum Capital
Mohan Naidu - Oppenheimer
Sean Wieland - Piper Jaffray
Steve Halper - Cantor Fitzgerald
Raymond Myers - Benchmark
Mitra Ramgopal - Sidoti
Operator
Good afternoon. My name is Holly, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time I would like to welcome everyone to the Omnicell Fourth Quarter Earnings Conference Call. [Operator Instructions]
I would now like to turn today’s call over to Mr. Peter Kuipers, Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Kuipers, the floor is yours.
Peter Kuipers
Thank you. Good morning and welcome to the Omnicell fourth quarter and fiscal year 2016 results conference call. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. Later we will conduct the Q&A session, and instructions will follow at that time. Joining me today is Randall Lipps, Omnicell Founder, Chairman, President, and CEO.
This call will include forward-looking statements subject to risks, uncertainties, and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. For a more detailed description of the risks that impact these forward-looking statements, please refer to the information in our press release today in the Omnicell annual report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on February 26, 2016 and in other more recent reports filed with the SEC.
Please be aware that you should not place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements made today. The day of this conference call is February 15, 2017, and all forward-looking statements made on this call are made based on the beliefs of Omnicell as of this date only. Future events or simply the passage of time may cause these beliefs to change.
Finally, this conference call is the property of Omnicell, Inc., and any taping, audio duplication, or rebroadcast without the express written consent of Omnicell, Inc., is prohibited. Randall will first provide an update on our business. Then I will cover our results for the 2016 and our guidance for 2017. Following our prepared remarks, we will take your questions. Our fourth quarter and full year financial results are, as usual, included in our earnings announcement, which was released earlier today and is posted in the investor relations section of our website at omnicell.com. Our prepared remarks will also be posted in the same section.
Let me now turn over the call to Randall.
Randall Lipps
Good afternoon, everyone. We’re excited to discuss our fourth quarter and full year results as well as our expectations for 2017. We had a great response to our announcement at ASHP in December last year on our new XT Series from both existing and potential new customers. Now consistent with our long-term successful go-to-market strategy that has helped us win in the marketplace, we’re continuing to be committed to deliver long-term value to our customers and we are allowing customers to upgrade their G4 products that they’ve already booked with us in backlog to the XT Series to get the full benefits of the product and this is really important and understanding Omnicell’s go-to-market and philosophy in the marketplace. It’s to allow for our customers to integrate next generation technologies with minimal disruption and so the conversion of our current G4 bookings to XT backlog does take some time as we offer this to our customers and then it takes time mostly in repapering IT reviews and hospitals and in some cases even C-Suite re-approvals.
Our consultants need to explain the differences and the benefits of the XT series. It is not usually a long process but explanation and confirmation does take some time. Now as a result of our expected conversion of our G4 bookings and backlog to XT bookings. The XT manufacturing and installation ramp up, we anticipate two quarters of transition disruption which started earlier than we anticipated and we saw that actually in the month of December last year.

Now we expect the backlog revenue conversion to be normalized in more historical levels starting in the second quarter of 2017. We are in the initial stages of the XT rollout, we are shipping and installing XT every day, in order to meet demand we are starting a second shift at our XT manufacturing site this month to meet those demands. The initial customer experience is extremely positive, we’ve already shipped XT to 24 sites. One of our leading institutions in the United States recently commented in an industry journal that XT is more responsive, faster and easier to use delivering a positive impact on patient care and staff efficiency. Now this is exactly why we design the XT Series and is consistent with the positive response we received in December at the ASHP trade show as well as at [indiscernible] where large number of customers were able to see and experience firsthand the advantages of the new XT series.
Now despite the yearend disruption in December I’m really proud of our performance in 2016 overall and our consistent track record over the past several years. To review the full year of 2016 was a company record for bookings, backlog, revenues and earnings. For 2016, product bookings were $541 million up 38% for 2015 on a reported basis and up 10% from 2015 when including Aesynt for the full year in 2015 and within our guidance range provided in our third quarter results earnings call.
For the fourth quarter non-GAAP revenue was $175 million bringing total year non-GAAP revenue to $703 million and company record and within the guidance range provided in our third quarter results earnings call. During the fourth quarter we did experience some customers wanting to switch from a G4 install to an XT install causing a modest impact on our revenue. Now combined with good cost execution non-GAAP EPS was $0.37 bringing total year non-GAAP EPS to $1.51 and within a guidance range provided in our third quarter results earnings call.
So now we finish 2016 with a strong annualized new competitive conversion rate of 30% of bookings, this was a great indicator of the strength of the business over 75% of these bookings were competitive conversions and the remainder were from Greenfield customers who have never automated before. We believe that the new account strength and our install customer base gives us a robust platform for future growth driven by expansion, replacement and upgrade sales as well as cross selling opportunities across our product portfolio.
Now in the last couple of years we’ve successfully grown the business by implementing three scalable growth strategies, growth through differentiated solutions, growth in new markets and growth via acquisitions. For 11 consecutive years now we have received the top owners from KLAS, the prestigious third-party rating organization for 12 consecutive years we’ve increased our market share and gained new thought leader customers every quarter.
Together with our customers we’re consistently delivering state of the art medication management automation and workflow efficiency for caregivers and better healthcare outcomes for patients. Now in 2016, we continue to experience great wins and added notable customers to our Omnicell family under our first strategic pillar of differentiated solutions. With several large competitive conversions, we estimate that we gain further market share in 2016 and continuation of the market share gains trend and momentum we have experienced for many years.
In the fourth quarter we had some great wins with prominent new customers as well as significant deals with existing customers including WellStar, DCH Health System, Inova Health System. Now we’re real excited to announce that WellStar Health System the largest health system in Georgia has selected the full breadth of Omnicell’s automated medication management and analytic solutions for its hospital floors, central pharmacy and operating rooms throughout its facilities. WellStar is focused on improving the patient experience across it’s enterprise as well as streamlining provider workflows and increasing patient safety. To accomplish this, they’re implementing the new Omnicell XT automated dispensing systems on hospital floors, the XT and a seizure workstation and operating rooms and controlled substance manager in the central pharmacy as well as analytics tools.

In addition, WellStar purchased both our i.v.SOFT semi-automated and i.v.STATION, fully automated IV solutions to improve accuracy of compounded medications prepared on site. DCH Health System and West Alabama has also chosen Omni IV solutions to support their sterile compounding operation through advanced IV automation technology supported by Omnicell’s robotic IV Insourcing Service or RIIS as we call it. DCH will be able to create a safer more accurate and ultimately more cost effective compounding operation. We demonstrated the IV solutions RIIS model at the ASHP mid-year and have experienced strong interest from existing and potential new customers.
The IV RIIS solutions contracts are multi-year with no capital outlay for the provider system. Inova Health System a non-profit healthcare system based in Northern Virginia will incorporate the Omnicell performance center an integrated software and services offering to drive improve pharmacy operations and reduce cost. Through enterprise wide management of pharmacy operations Inova will achieve shared inventory visibility, inventory optimization through relocation of needed medications and the ability to leverage strategic buying opportunities.
Our second strategic pillar expanding into new markets also fuel growth in the last several years and we believe sets us up well for the coming years. Internationally current customer Rashid Hospital, a 599 bed general, medical and surgical hospital in Dubai and one of the premier medical facilities for emergency, trauma, critical and ambulatory care chose Omnicell’s XT Series automated dispensing systems to complement their previously purchased state of the art robotic dispensing system. Rashid Hospital is part of the Dubai Health Authority and is one of the first of the DHA hospitals to employ robotic technologies in its pharmacy.
Our third strategic pillar of expanding our presence and relevance through acquisition has also continued to deliver great results. The Aesynt integration is progressing well, the product portfolio integration is ahead of schedule and the cost synergies are as expected. Already we’re seeing cross-selling opportunities within the total product portfolio and combined customer base specifically for our IV and performance center solutions.
Also our medication adherence business continues to align to macro trends that is poised for growth. On December 8, 2016 we completed the acquisition of a leading retail pharmacy software provider Ateb located in Raleigh, North Carolina. The acquisition reinforces the commitment by Omnicell to help improve patient care and outcomes. In this instance by simplifying management of chronic conditions through increased access to medication adherence solutions. Ateb has more than 30 leading retail pharmacy chains and customers and increases Omnicell pharmacy locations by 15,000. The Ateb acquisition broadens our medication adherence solution scope and now combines into one industry leading product portfolio.
Ateb’s innovative patient engagement platform including the market leading Time My Meds medication synchronization software. This solution capitalizes on the retail pharmacy trend toward the appointment base model and medication synchronization. And we believe by 2020, 60% of all retail pharmacy scripts are expected to be dispensed via the appointment base model and combine that with Omnicell’s SureMed medication adherence packaging work symbiotically with this model add to that our broad range of related packaging automation including the Omnicell VBM 200 just announced yesterday and the M5000 and you have a complete product portfolio. This acquisition enables pharmacist improved patient outcomes in retail settings, addressing the problem at medication non-adherence and problem that is estimated to cost more than $105 billion in US alone with more than 32 million Americans taking five or more maintenance medications daily.

We believe our hard work over the years and the execution of our three legged strategy laid the foundation for success in 2016 and sets up for continued future growth in scale. And today’s evolving healthcare environment, we remain focused on our mission to change the practice of healthcare with solutions that improve patient and provider outcomes.
Let me turn the call back over to Peter for some numbers and guidance.
Peter Kuipers
Thank you, Randall. I’ll discuss a summary of our fourth quarter and full year financial results and our guidance for 2017. As Randall mentioned earlier in this call, the 2016 product bookings were a record $541 million up 38% on a reported basis and up 10% in 2015 when including Aesynt for the full year in 2015.
The resulting backlog of $301 million for December 31, 2016 is up from $205 million at December 31, 2015 which is a company record and represents a year-over-year increase of 47%. Our fourth quarter 2016 GAAP revenue of $172 million was up 32% from the same quarter last year and down 3% sequentially. As Randall referred to earlier in this call, the announcement of the Omnicell XT Series caught some delays in December and impacted our fourth quarter revenue modestly for new customers that wanted to switch to XT installs.
The full year 2016 year-over-year strengthened revenue was driven by both expansion and upgrades at existing customers as well as by new and competitive conversion customers. We continue to see particular strength of the combined solutions portfolio that enabled strategic, tailored, [indiscernible] solutions for our customers.
Earnings per share per in accordance with GAAP were $0.00, which is down from $0.21 in the fourth quarter of 2015. GAAP gross margin for the quarter was at 43.2%. In addition to GAAP financial results, we reported our results on a non-GAAP basis, which excludes stock compensation expense and amortization of intangible assets associated with acquisitions. One-time acquisition-related expenses and the acquisition accounting impacts related to deferred revenue and inventory fair value adjustments.
We use non-GAAP financial statements in addition to GAAP financial statements because we believe it’s useful for investors to understand acquisition amortization-related costs and non-cash stock compensation expenses that are components of our reported results, as well as one-time events, such as the gain on the Avantec investment in 2015 and the one-time acquisition related expenses. A full reconciliation of our GAAP to non-GAAP results is included in our fourth quarter earnings release and is posted on our website.
Our fourth quarter 2016 non-GAAP revenues of $175 million were up 34% from the same quarter last year and down 2% sequentially. On a non-GAAP basis, earnings per share of $0.37 in the fourth quarter of 2016, down $0.03 or 8% from the same quarter last year and down $0.03 sequentially. Non-GAAP revenue of $703 million for full year 2016 was a company record representing an increase of 45% year-over-year. Non-GAAP EPS of $1.51 per share for full year 2016 was also a record. Non-GAAP gross margin was 48.1% in the fourth quarter and 50.0% for full year 2016.
The non-GAAP gross margin was negatively impacted in the fourth quarter 2016 by lower overhead cost absorption as we entered into the product launch phase of the XT Series and also less overhead cost could be absorbed by lower G4 volume in the quarter when compared to prior quarters. The negative impact of lower gross margins on non-GAAP EPS was approximately offset by R&D tax credit settlement benefit for the years prior to 2015 of around $2 million. Non-GAAP adjusted EBITDA was $23.3 million for the fourth quarter of 2016 and was $103 million from total year 2016 or up 19% from total year 2015.

Our business is also reported in segments consisting of automation, analytics and medication adherence. Automation analytics consists of our XT AcuDose and OmniRx automated dispensing cabinets, anesthesia workstations, central pharmacy, Omnicell supply, Omnicell analytics, and MACH4 robotic dispensing systems. Our acquisitions of Avantec, MACH4, and Aesynt are also included in this segment.
The medication adherence segment consists of all adherence packaged consumables, which are branded as SureMed and equipment used by pharmacists to create adherence packages. Our acquisitions of MTS Medication Technologies, SurgiChem Limited and [indiscernible] Inc. are included in the medication adherence segment. As a reminder, we now report certain corporate expenses that cannot be easily applied to either segment separately.
On a segment basis, our automation and analytics segments contributed $144 million in GAAP revenues in the fourth quarter of 2016, up from $106 million in the fourth quarter of 2015 or an increase of 36%, driven by the acquisition of Aesynt and organic growth. $18.6 million of GAAP operating income this quarter compares to $29 million for the same quarter last year. $32.4 million of non-GAAP operating income in the fourth quarter of 2016 compares to $31.3 million last year in the fourth quarter.
The medication adherence segment contributed $28.4 million of GAAP revenue to the quarter compared to $24.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2015. GAAP operating income of $1 million compares to $1.3 million a year ago. The weaker Great Britain pound exchange rate impacted medication adherence operating income by around $700,000 compared to the same quarter last year as most of the medication adherence product sold in the United Kingdom are manufactured in the United States.
Non-GAAP operating income was $2.8 million in the fourth quarter compared to $2.6 million of non-GAAP operating income in the fourth quarter a year ago. Non-GAAP common expenses were $16.5 million compared to $13.4 million in the same quarter last year and the increase is mostly driven by the Aesynt acquisition. Non-GAAP operating margin was 11.6% for full year 2016 including the Aesynt integration cost. Excluding the Aesynt integration cost non-GAAP operating margin was 13% for 2016.
In the fourth quarter of 2016, our cash increased from $47 million to $54 million, primarily driven by strong cash flow from operations. Total year 2016 cash flow from operations is $48 million up from $34 million in 2015. Our strong cash flow in the year enabled us to repay approximately $35 million of the outstanding balance during the year as of December 31, 2016 we had $60 million of outstanding from the debt and a loan leverage measured as outstanding total from the loan balance over the last 12 months of EBITDA was 2.4.
Accounts receivable days outstanding were 82 for the fourth quarter, down 9 days from the third quarter. The decrease in DSO was driven by record cash collections in the quarter. For contracts [ph] our customer agreements specify that for equipment sales, the company typically invoices 100% of the contract value at shipment date. We review the collectability of our receivables regularly, and we do not believe that the fluctuation DSO are indicative of a change in our rate of bad debt.
Inventories at December 31, 2016 were $69 million and down $5 million from last quarter. Our headcount was 2,444 for the end of the year with increase from last quarter driven by the acquisition of Ateb in December last year.
Let me now move to guidance for 2017. During the last year we introduced the XT Series to a number of customers on the non-disclosure agreements for first launch purposes. We gave these customers the opportunity to move from G4 to XT and the vast majority of these customers are moving to installing XT starting in the first quarter of 2017 and ramping through the year in 2017.

We do see some timing delays of the conversion of G4 bookings and sales quotes to XT bookings and revenue as Randall talked about earlier in the call, that is mostly driven by paper work and approvals taking longer than expected and timing of the scheduling of implementations. Stepping back and looking at 2017. 2017 will be characterized by two distinct different phases as revenue and profitability are impacted by the XT product introduction and ramp up.
The first distinct phase is the start and ramp up of manufacturing of the XT Series product in the first quarter of 2017 as installations start. The first quarter 2017 dynamics are expected to be as follows: first of all performance [ph] of the G4 product backlog and sales quotes in the field to XT bookings. Secondly, the XT manufacturing volume is ramping up and we’re starting the second shift in our XT manufacturing plant this month. Thirdly we’ve the first installs at large [ph] customers this quarter and we also have the dynamic of XT manufacturing ramp up cost as we start production.
In the first quarter of 2017, we’re taking the following actions to drive offsets. The company today announced, a 100 positions reduction in force including the closure of our Tennessee office. We will also have general hiring delays to contain cost. As part of the next phase of the integration of the acquisition of Aesynt. The company is creating the following Centers of Excellence or COEs for product development, engineering and manufacturing. First, the Point of Use COE in California, second the robotics and Central Pharmacy COE in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania and third the Medication Adherence Consumables COE in St. Petersburg, Florida.
The majority of the reduction in force was around 100 positions over various locations is expected to be completed in the first quarter 2017 and enables the creation of these centers of excellence and also enables the achievement of the cost synergies contemplated in the acquisition of Aesynt. This reduction in force includes the closure of the company’s national Tennessee office, we’re also planning to move the manufacturing of IC machines for the non-US customers from our Slovenia plant to the Pittsburgh Robotics and Central Pharmacy COE in the third quarter of 2017 to consolidate the IC manufacturing globally and we will close the Slovenia plant after this transition.
The company expects to incur approximately $8 million of severance related cost and facilities restructuring cost in connection with this reduction in force and the two location closures. For the first quarter 2017, we expect non-GAAP revenue to be between $150 million and $155 million. We expect the first quarter 2017 non-GAAP earnings to be between $0.00 and $0.04 per share.
Let’s now move to the second phase in the year, the second distinct phase is the acceleration of installations of XT product and conversion of backlog into revenue during the second through fourth quarter of 2017. The second through fourth quarter 2017 dynamics are expected to be as follows; we will launch the AcuDose software on XT platform, we expect to see improved XT production cost, we expect to see bookings growth year-over-year organically and on a reported basis to be greater than 20%. We also expect to return to 8% to 12% organic revenue growth.
During the second through fourth quarter 2017 we’re planning to take the following actions. XT cost of goods sold reductions as revenue ramps continued cost actions and roles implementing the development in manufacturing satisfaction as mentioned before. For the second through fourth quarter 2017 we expect total non-GAAP revenue to be between $590 million and $605 million representing a return to the 8% to 12% organic revenue growth long-term target. For the second through fourth quarters of 2017 we expect total non-GAAP earnings to be between $1.32 and $1.38 representing a 17% growth in earnings when using the midpoint of $1.35.

For 2017 we expect product bookings to be between $570 million and $590 million also consisting of two distinct phases. First, a year-over-year bookings decline in the first quarter 2017 as teams are working with customers to confer committed existing G4 contracts and sales quotes to XT bookings. In the second phase, is the second quarter through the fourth quarter of the year and we expect there as mentioned before and above 20% growth in product bookings both on the reported and organic basis.
We expect non-GAAP revenue for full year to be between $740 million and $760 million, we expect 2017 non-GAAP earnings to be between $1.32 and $1.42. For clarity we have summarized our 2017 guidance for the two distinct phases on a specific table included in the press release 8K issued today as well as in the investor presentation posted on the IR section on omnicell.com.
We expect non-GAAP operating margins from 2017 to be approximately 11% including integration cost for Aesynt and Ateb. Excluding the integration for Aesynt and Ateb acquisitions we expect non-GAAP operating margin for 2017 to be slightly above 12%. Given the ramp up of revenue and profitability through the year in 2017 described earlier in this call we expect that the non-GAAP operating margin for the fourth quarter in 2017 after excluding integration for Aesynt and Ateb to be approximately between 15% and 16% in line with our long-term financial model.
[Indiscernible] 2017 it is important to know couple of items included in the 2017 guidance. First of all, for 2017 our non-GAAP expected result include approximately $12 million of integration expense for Aesynt and Ateb that we do not adjust for based on a non-GAAP policy. These integration cost directly impacting non-GAAP operating margins and non-GAAP EPS mostly consist for integration related IT expenses specifically sales CRM [ph] and financial ERP [ph] implementations. It also includes integration team and project cost. Cost related to the implementation of Sarbanes Oxley. Cost related to tax restructuring and cost related to accelerated product development integration cost.
In 2017 we are expecting second year cost synergies for around $10 million as we have demonstrated in the past we’re confident to achieve our 50% non-GAAP operating margin overtime after integrating the acquired businesses and getting full benefit of the scale to combined business.
Lastly for 2017 we expect interest expense related to the senior secured credit facility used to finance the Aesynt and Ateb acquisitions to be around $7 million or equivalent to non-GAAP EPS of around $0.11 impact. Finally we’re assuming annual average effective tax rate of 38% and GAAP earnings on a combined basis. As discussed on previous earnings call it’s important to note that from time-to-time installation completion timing and specifically bigger projects can impact revenue earnings in a given quarter, but we don’t expect [indiscernible] fluctuations to impact the growth rate measured over multiple rolling quarters.
To round out our update. I’ll hand the call back to Randall.
Randall Lipps
Well I think 2016 was a water shed year for Omnicell. We had the integration of Aesynt which really helped to drive record bookings backlog, revenue and earnings and it significantly broadened our solutions portfolio, strengthened our role as a strategic solutions provider to very large health systems which really positioned us totally different in the marketplace. I’m really also pleased with our integration of Aesynt which allows us to move forward with second phase of this integration which involves mostly systems and process implementation as well as joint product development and roadmaps and of course we couldn’t be more pleased with the response and the uptake on the XT Series which we’re shipping, installing every day and trying to figure out how to put more through the manufacturing process to get more out there.

And we continue to believe with what we’re seeing in Health System with both existing in new customers are truly assessing their need for improving the efficiency and the safety around their medication processes and looking across the continuum and they’re evaluating a breadth of solutions sets and breadth of solution options out there and it sure feels good that they’re choosing Omnicell.
So that ends our prepared remarks and now operator, we would like to open it up for questions please.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
[Operator Instructions] and our first question is going to come from the line of Matt Hewitt with Craig-Hallum Capital.
Matt Hewitt
Several questions from me. First, it sounds like you had a greater response from customers that were in queue to buy G4 that now want to switch over to XT, is that accurate and is that why you’re scrambling to ramp up production of the XT in adding that second shift?
Randall Lipps
Yes I think that we thought that G4 would wind down and more of - add a steady pace, floor pace and that XT would ramp up and then almost from the day we announced XT, everybody said wait you guys only put out a new platform every 10 years I want to really consider putting this in. So it really pushed off decisions that would have been G4 and they wanted to get into queue for XT and particularly this quarter we did not have enough supply, the XT systems to meet what would normally be our revenue goal. So it’s not a - and so I guess you’re right the reaction to XT lot of people, we thought would have stopped with the G4 just because they’ve, they already have a lot of G4 in hospital they did, maybe they wouldn’t want all of their systems to be the next XT system but most of the people we were surprised wanted to do that and that really sucked our sales force back into particularly Q1 and now to repapering this stuff and bringing in our consultants to reconfigure based on the XT system because it is slightly different than the G4, it’s not a direct translation over. So XT I’d have to say is a booming success.
Matt Hewitt
Okay, secondly your guidance Peter and I think you touched on this a little bit. Your guidance in applying another step down in gross margin either GAAP or adjusted for the first quarter and then you would think you would start to ramp up, what are the key points that you mentioned at the Analysts Day back in December was that the XT will actually carry a higher gross margin than the G4. How long until we start to see some of the benefits of that, obviously this year as you get the transition period, but is that an 2018 event?
Peter Kuipers
Towards the end of the year in 2017, we’ll see some benefit already - total cost XT versus G4. So I was going to say, of course dependent on volume when you repurchase more volume you can negotiate better rates, you can run the plants and more efficiently etc., so and that will flow through the gross margins towards the first parts of that towards the end of the year in 2017, so we don’t need to wait all the way through 2018.
Matt Hewitt
Okay, maybe two more from me and then I hop back in the queue. Number one, if you could touch on performance center briefly, you did mention one win there but where are you from a customer standpoint, if you don’t mind and what is the adoption curve kind of been like for that product.
Randall Lipps
Well we’re getting great adoption and traction in the marketplace. I think we’re not on the exact numbers at least 10 to 15 customers we have going signed up for the product and given these contracts, these are multi-year contracts of very large institutions and we have a large pipeline of more customers lined up for, so we feel that this is - rings very true in the macro trends and healthcare and it’s just a natural combination of all the other things that we have to offer fits right in with it.

Matt Hewitt
Okay, great. One last one from me and then I’ll hop back in the queue. I just want to make sure I heard you correctly. I think Peter you mentioned there was $12 million of integration expenses that were actually included or kept in your adjusted guidance, is that accurate?
Peter Kuipers
That is correct.
Matt Hewitt
Okay, great. Thank you.
Operator
Our next question will come from the line of Mohan Naidu with Oppenheimer.
Mohan Naidu
Randy, I just want to go back to the bookings questions a bit again. The book in December, do you guys see delays in new bookings as well as the customers thought about getting into XT are - is just revenue conversion that got delayed.
Randall Lipps
Well I think the bookings were pretty steady through December, but as soon as we announced XT, we did see a few bookings it’s not very many that were impacted by XT and but most of the people already had the paperwork through the systems and just about signed, but there’s actually a little more disruption in Q1 where paperwork hadn’t been quite circulated all the way around and now we’re pulling it back and re-circulating it with XT as far as new bookings and then as well, we’re also working on old bookings in G4 several hundred millions of backlog we have that need to be converted to XT as well.
Mohan Naidu
Okay, maybe a topical question around hospital spending environment that you’re looking at right now. Are you seeing any changes in the pace of deals closure or anything like that because hospitals are thinking about any upcoming changes from the new administration?
Randall Lipps
For our market segment we have not seen any slowdown in hospital. I think hospitals continue to be very strategic about acquiring our types of systems. They want standardization, they want cost control, they want safety, they want regulatory compliance and they want it uniform across all of their provider facilities and that’s why they’re acquiring provider facilities and they want to leverage those and then a key driver is, they want to integrate that into their enterprise technology systems that they have on the health record side and so we play extremely well into those aspects of what the market needs and wants in the macro trends to be successful.
So we really just not have, not seen customer saying well, we don’t want to spend the money on this infrastructure right now or on this type of project, we have not seen that.
Mohan Naidu
Okay, great. Peter one quick question for you. How much are you baking in for Ateb contribution for calendar 2017 guidance?
Peter Kuipers
So we’re not breaking it out specifically, what we said before though is that on LTM basis per September 30, last year Ateb LTM revenue was about $28 million. Assume that roughly to be double-digit business, it’s in the fast growing segment specifically the med synchronization Time My Meds as offer, is really gaining [indiscernible] in the market.
Mohan Naidu
Okay, does this going to the medication adherence segment when you report?
Peter Kuipers
Yes it is included there.
Mohan Naidu
Okay, all right. Thank you very much.
Operator
And our next question will come from the line of Sean Wieland with Piper Jaffray.
Sean Wieland
So, if I’m an existing G4 client, right now what is my sense of urgency to upgrade to the XT platform?
Randall Lipps
Well I think the issue is your next order that you’re going to get and the hospital. Right now, you’re in this window the next incremental one you want in 60% to 70% of our orders were all from current customers, you got to decide am I going to go with G4 or XT, so as I just said, most people are saying, the next incremental one I want is XT and then this set you up and I think most hospital networks and providers understand that this is the system of the future, to get the next generation of software you have to have a next generation of hardware first and so they’re trying to orient their investments overtime to make sure they get the platform eventually upgraded to XT. Now a lot of our customers, large percentage of our customers of more than half of the systems we have out in the market place are seven years or older, so their systems are old and we are eventually not going to service those just because that’s too old to service as we continue on, so it’s really a question of winding down those systems and taking them out of the market. So that would probably be the biggest driver as far as why customer is not [ph], eventually slow.

Sean Wieland
So give us the sense of the magnitude if you could of the upsell of the G4 to XT versus G3 to G4. Not on a per customer basis, but you know from your perspective from the company’s perspective.
Peter Kuipers
So the difference between the G4 upgrade which is the brain or the G4 console only, that’s part of the total the automated dispensing cabinet, a full fray of XT’s 456X the revenue if you will for an upgrade.
Randall Lipps
And so G4 was, I think around $250 million to $300 million opportunity and this is close to $2 billion as we replace all of the equipment over the next seven-ish years because we have both the Aesynt installed base to replace and the Omnicell installed base to place. So it’s a huge opportunity for us.
Sean Wieland
Okay and so what - because it’s the full frame is what you’re saying is the greater opportunity.
Peter Kuipers
Yes.
Sean Wieland
Okay and so what’s the visibility you got on the acceleration to 20% bookings growth starting in Q2?
Peter Kuipers
We have a pipeline that we’re working, we feel pretty good about the feasibility there and the benefits of the new products. We’ve already talked about the aged equipments in the fields more than 50% older than seven years and particularly also in the Aesynt AcuDose installed base is actually ageing a little bit more, so we feel good about the opportunity there to for replacement.
Sean Wieland
Okay, thanks so much.
Operator
Our next question will come from the line of Steve Halper with Cantor Fitzgerald.
Steve Halper
Two questions. The $12 million of integration expense that’s included in the numbers, what does that compared to in 2016?
Peter Kuipers
So in 2016, we had about $10 million integration cost for Aesynt and then in 2017 planning roughly little bit less than $11 million for Aesynt and around $1 million for Ateb.
Steve Halper
No go ahead Peter, [indiscernible].
Peter Kuipers
I was going to say that we expect to substantially complete the integration projects for Aesynt by the end of the year in fiscal 2017, right so that will then falloff be significantly reduced fairly small amount in 2018.
Steve Halper
And the cost that you called out for headcount reduction and facility leases, is that $8 million, is that also included in the adjusted earnings guidance?
Peter Kuipers
Yes those will be GAAP only, we would adjust those out as one-time, as those cost would not be in the non-GAAP results.
Steve Halper
Okay, so the $8 million are not in the non-GAAP results.
Peter Kuipers
Correct.
Steve Halper
Okay.
Operator
Our next question will come from the line of Raymond Myers with Benchmark.
Raymond Myers
Randall and Peter, maybe you can help me to kind of walk me through what happens when a customer decides they were going to upgrade to the G4 and now you’ve introduced the XT. Do they hold back on the G4? Are most of them simply holding their orders and not moving forward with anything for the time being while they make the determination or are many of them actually signing for the XT and when that is the case? My understanding is that purchase price is several multiples higher than the G4 conversion. So if you do the math, if a large proportion of customers make the conversion the revenue opportunity to Omnicell should be much higher in the second half of the year as you convert those customers to XT and yet your guidance doesn’t quite reflect that, can you help us understand?
Randall Lipps
Yes so we use the G4 console upgrade is different than the G4 frame, right? They’re both G4 versions of the product. So customer that’s expanding to adds a new hospital to their network would buy regular G4 frames and put an order within us because they’re adding this hospital to their network and so they would have an order for 20, G4 frames that’s not G4 console frame. Consoles, that’s the whole system. Those are the ones that are being converted, their whole systems that are being converted from G4 whole frames, the G to XT. There are not that many customers out there left that could use a G4 upgrade console only.

So when we talk about converting the G4 in our backlog that’s the current full fledge model that we’re shipping up until the middle of January, middle of January we started shipping XT as well, so it’s a replacement of one full model for the other. It isn’t the upgrade of the G4 consoles that people are swapping out for the full frame. It’s full frame for full frame.
Raymond Myers
Okay, so in the case where it’s full frame for full frame the pricing I understand is more similar, but you would have the opportunity for an upgrade cycle for all the previous G4’s that you sold it in all year history, so that’s where that the million opportunity come.
Randall Lipps
That’s exactly right.
Raymond Myers
So the disconnect is, when does this great opportunity flow through to your income statement because it doesn’t seem like it’s happening quite yet?
Peter Kuipers
This is Peter. The second through fourth quarter phase this year we’re expected to be back in the organic growth range of 8% to 12%, so you can see your start there and then the EPS if you take the non-GAAP EPS you take the midpoint of the range that we gave, if you’re looking at 70% year-over-year, so starting to fall through there as well.
Randall Lipps
Yes, so the big difference I think is that this conversion of current customer base to the new technology is somewhere between a five to 10-year process and which all the customers eventually swap out. It isn’t there - they don’t want to swap out in the 12-month frame or 24-month frame. It’s probably five to seven-ish type year timeframe and we’re just at the beginning of the cycle. In other words we just announced XT, so most of the customers who would be willing to swap out or could swap out older equipment are customers who have fiscal dollars in the second half of 2017, who we would target as replacing over equipment because it takes time to cycle the funds into the budgets and then of course as you keep moving on through the cycle 2018, 2019 it continues to build.
Raymond Myers
Okay, that helps. Thank you and on the performance center I think you previously said 10 to 15 at least customer installation so far, can you give us a sense of what revenue contribution that product might be this year?
Peter Kuipers
Yes, so we’re not breaking out the product line specifically, but each of the contracts on average are multi-year, multi-million dollars but you have to be fired of course, the contract amount over the number of the years that the contract runs, right. So it’s kind of layering recurring revenue the model if you will, but we’re ramping fairly aggressively there.
Randall Lipps
Yes, we’ve 10 to 15 that have signed contracts, we don’t have 10 to 15 running yet and so we’re probably under 10 in the running and probably adding a few every quarter into the revenue line. But that’s recognized ratably over month-to-month, but its good margin obviously for us.
Raymond Myers
Okay, good and then maybe just clear up one final point. As we look at your guidance in December and in early January as compared to now, it seems to be a little different particularly as we look at Q1, was it the change in the last so many weeks that made your Q1 outlook a little different than it was before.
Peter Kuipers
Yes, so what Randy talked about earlier in the call so we were expecting two quarters of sensation - we do actually see that already in - we saw that already in December, so looking at the month of December plus into first quarter and a little bit in the second quarter as well. So the six month kind of shifted a little bit forward in our minds if you will, so that’s the difference. We’ve got good visibility starting into the second quarter as well [indiscernible] so we feel actually a little bit more confident than we were before instead of first half, second half we feel that at first quarter versus last nine months distinction is actually, is more reasonable for dynamics that we’ve seen.

Raymond Myers
Okay, so most of the impact has been now accelerated into Q1, do you have visibility from customer purchase agreements that this delay in purchases is abetting and they’re actually moving forward with a XT purchase decision and that simply is weighing [ph] entirely.
Randall Lipps
Yes, the backlog was being converted to XT, so we have really good visibility and we’re of course lining up the XT conversions to line up with the installation expectation, that’s why we feel really confident about Q2 and moving forward is we have excellent visibility there, as we’ve gotten folks to sign up and sign on the line for XT, but that was too late to get it manufactured, shipped and installed in Q1 but obviously it sets us up well for Q2 and beyond.
Raymond Myers
Okay, thank you that’s a really important point. Thank you very much.
Operator
And our next question will come from the line of Gene Mannheimer with Dougherty. Gene your line is open. Okay and we’ll go to the next question and that question will be from the line of Mitra Ramgopal with Sidoti.
Mitra Ramgopal
Just a couple of questions. First, in the past you’ve mentioned you expected the gain maybe 1%, 2% market share. With the success you’re having in terms of customer interest for the XT, you still hold to that or you think it could even be faster?
Peter Kuipers
Well looking at 2016 reducing that we gained one or two points off additional market share as we’ve done in the last couple of years especially notable of course is WellStar which is about full point of market share in the US. So we’re expecting to continue to competitive wins in 2017 as well. I think for now maybe Randy comment as well, but for now we’ll continue to assume that we keep gaining one to two points of absolute market share this year as well, if it’s higher then we’ll adjust but for now we’re assuming that.
Randall Lipps
The XT really is a game changer for us, it’s an advantage and the thing that I was trying to explain in the beginning of the call, the way we’re introducing this technology, the way the options that we’re giving our customers even though it’s caused some disruption here is what really drives them to choose us because we’re allowing them to get the technology integrated into their current platform and take advantage of it, in a very meaningful way now without having to convert everything at once but start the conversion now, knowing that over the next few years they’ll fully convert.
So this is grand promise that Omnicell has created in the marketplace and is what’s driven this 1% to 2% and this is just another clear commitment that Omnicell is making to their customer base that you’re going to be able to get long-term great return value with the best automation in the marketplace because we’re able to deliver the next generation of hardware and software with minimal disruption in the institution and that’s meaningful to people.
Mitra Ramgopal
Okay, thanks. And just quickly on the cost side, obviously you’re closing Tennessee facility. I think the Slovakia facility etc.
Peter Kuipers
Slovenia.
Mitra Ramgopal
Slovenia sorry, should we expect pretty much 2017 all the closures to be completed or do you anticipate this?
Peter Kuipers
All right, the group [ph] close to Tennessee office will be in the first quarter, the Slovenia plant will be closed by the end of the third quarter, this year.
Mitra Ramgopal
And in terms of additional closures etc. I guess, it’s probably a little too early for that.
Peter Kuipers
None plans at this time. None at this time.
Mitra Ramgopal
Okay, thank you.
Operator
Thank you. I’ll now turn the conference call over to Randall Lipps for closing comments.
Randall Lipps
Well again, thank you for joining us today. I know we had a lot of numbers and assessments for you guys to go through, but the momentum in the business is strong and volume bases are excited. I want to thank them for their hard work and getting this XT launch and the Aesynt integration, it’s really changed the dynamics of our company and sets up for a continued success with a great platform to reap many benefits over the many years to come. So thanks for joining us today and we’ll see you next time.

Peter Kuipers
Thank you.
Operator
Once again, we’d like to thank you for participating on today’s Omnicell fourth quarter earnings conference call. You may now disconnect.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Technology, Computer Based Systems, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All OMCL TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksThe Long Case For AppleAAPL• Today, 7:05 AM • Andres Cardenal, CFA•38 CommentsTwilio: Silver Lining In The CloudsTWLO• Today, 6:23 AM • Alpha Securities•8 CommentsMicrosoft: Post-Earnings AnalysisMSFT• Today, 6:09 AM • Roman Luzgin•8 CommentsApple Reportedly Funds Automotive Battery ResearchAAPL• Yesterday, 11:27 PM • Mark Hibben•29 CommentsThere's Not Much To Not Like About Microsoft HereMSFT• Yesterday, 6:38 PM • James Brumley•25 CommentsBillion-Dollar Unicorns: DraftKings Faces HurdlesDRAFT• Yesterday, 6:20 PM • Sramana MitraSnap's Farce: The Equity Incentive PlanSNAP• Yesterday, 6:17 PM • Whestuizen•87 CommentsSemiconductor ETFs To Roar Higher As Q2 Earnings UnfoldSOXX, SMH, PSI• Yesterday, 4:00 PM • Zacks FundsThe Short Case For WelbiltEditors' Pick • WBT• Yesterday, 4:00 PM • Rational Short Investor•1 CommentIBM: Don't Get Caught In A Value TrapIBM• Yesterday, 3:39 PM • Bank On Insight•17 CommentsNew Chance To Buy Into Shares Of Tintri At IPO Quiet Period ExpirationTNTR• Yesterday, 2:53 PM • Don Dion•1 CommentMicrosoft: A Great Dividend Growth Stock To ConsiderMSFT• Yesterday, 2:24 PM • Ploutos Investing•30 CommentsAMD To Easily Beat Revenue EstimatesAMD• Yesterday, 1:22 PM • Earnings Forecast Focus•92 CommentsStrong Product Rollout Suggests AMD Will Likely Raise Q3 GuidanceAMD• Yesterday, 12:32 PM • EnerTuition•46 CommentsA Thoughtful Investment With Help From Baidu BrainBIDU• Yesterday, 12:16 PM • Tobias Beith•5 CommentsHow BlackBerry Can Quickly Increase Its Software RevenueBBRY• Yesterday, 11:47 AM • Motek Moyen•64 CommentsEarnings Watch: What Will Boost Facebook?FB• Yesterday, 11:33 AM • Feria Investor•20 CommentsKey Lessons From Facebook And WWE SpeculationFB• Yesterday, 11:26 AM • Gary Bourgeault•2 CommentsWhy You Should Sell Amazon After Its Next Earnings ReleaseAMZN• Yesterday, 11:09 AM • Robert Riesen•51 CommentsMicrosoft Keeps Performing Very Well - But Don't Get FooledMSFT• Yesterday, 11:08 AM • Jonathan Weber•24 CommentsSkyworks: Another Home RunSWKS• Yesterday, 10:57 AM • Kumquat Research•15 CommentsDump Cincinnati Bell On 2 Terrible AcquisitionsEditors' Pick • CBB, HCOM• Yesterday, 10:39 AM • John Zhang•3 CommentsAmazon Acts Against Its Greatest ThreatAMZN• Yesterday, 10:34 AM • David Pinsen•57 CommentsMicrosoft First Look: Beyond My ExpectationsMSFT• Yesterday, 9:18 AM • D.M. Martins Research•18 CommentsVirtusa Corp. Is Completing Its Bottom, Now It Could Break OutVRTU• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • John LongsworthQuickLogic: Pre-Q2 2017 Results - Accumulate OpportunisticallyQUIK• Yesterday, 8:39 AM • Jay Deahna•3 CommentsWhen Divorce Becomes Inevitable: Preserve Capital And Grow IncomeIRM• Yesterday, 8:00 AM • George Schneider•66 CommentsAT&T: Oversold, Unloved, And Poised To PopT• Yesterday, 8:00 AM • David Alton Clark•66 CommentsWatch Jeff Bezos's Drone-Shot Preview Of Blue Origin's New FactoryAMZN• Yesterday, 7:49 AM • SA News TeamYou Should Own Facebook Despite These 3 RisksFB• Yesterday, 1:17 AM • First Floor Finance•23 CommentsRed Hat: The Next Cloud GiantRHT• Thu, Jul. 20, 6:49 PM • Prasanna Rajagopal•2 CommentsAMD Vega Is StillbornAMD• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:40 PM • Paulo Santos•319 CommentsIngenico (INGIY) Acquires Bambonra - SlideshowINGIY• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:04 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Short Case For HubspotEditors' Pick • HUBS• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:00 PM • Short Biased•3 CommentsAVX (AVX) Acquires The Transportation, Sensing, & Control Division Of TT Electronics PLC - SlideshowAVX• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:54 PM • SA TranscriptsCohu Has A Compelling Turnaround Growth Story That You Need To KnowCOHU• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:51 PM • Shark Traders•1 CommentAMD, Nvidia, Intel: A Trio ValuationAMD, INTC, NVDA• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:28 PM • Kwan-Chen Ma•136 CommentsMicron: Valuation Reveals UpsideMU• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:34 PM • Focus Equity•26 CommentsMassRoots: Riding The Cannabis WaveMSRT• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:15 PM • Stone Fox Capital•13 CommentsMicron And Intel: The AI And Security Play Of The CenturyEditors' Pick • MU• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:13 PM • Stephen Breezy•190 CommentsMicrosoft Earnings Set To InspireMSFT• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:56 PM • Feria Investor•5 CommentsDeNA (DNACF) Investor Presentation - SlideshowDNACF• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:52 PM • SA TranscriptsIs The Writing On The Wall For Micron?MU• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:39 PM • Shareholders Unite•43 CommentsAMD: The Catalyst No One Is Talking AboutAMD• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:35 PM • Kumquat Research•79 CommentsIntel Is A Solid Buy At Current LevelsINTC• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:33 PM • Roman Luzgin•21 CommentsFocused The Present, Not Dreaming The Future - Why Zynga Canned Mafia WarsZNGA• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:28 PM • Jonathan Jordan•15 CommentsMicrosoft Earnings: A Look At What Might Be Expected For Fiscal Q4MSFT• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:59 PM • JJ Kinahan•1 CommentDon't Get Fooled By IBMIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:41 PM • Jonathan Weber•22 CommentsSalesforce.com: Market Dominance Is Not The Best Investment CriterionCRM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:39 PM • Beulah Meriam K•6 CommentsCorning Acquires SpiderCloud Wireless For In-Building TechnologyGLW• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:39 PM • Donovan Jones•5 CommentsEarnings Watch: Apple & The U.S. DollarAAPL• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:30 PM • Feria Investor•40 CommentsActivision Blizzard: Great Buying OpportunityATVI• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:27 PM • Roman Luzgin•26 CommentsRevenues Aren't The Only Thing Falling At IBMIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:01 PM • Marshall Thomas•13 CommentsIBM: How Long Until I Should Throw In The Towel?IBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:44 AM • Nicholas Ward•113 CommentsWhy Intel Said Sayonara To Smart Devices & WearablesINTC• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:42 AM • Motek Moyen•27 CommentsNokia: Tricky Trade, Still Bullish Long-TermNOK• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:33 AM • D.M. Martins Research•21 CommentsIntel And IBM Making Nvidia Their Breakfast SandwichIBM, INTC, NVDA• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:20 AM • Right Angle•5 CommentsPositioning For AT&T EarningsT• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:44 AM • Josh Arnold•15 CommentsIBM: A Perma-Bear ReassessesIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:27 AM • DoctoRx•38 CommentsAT&T Keeps Taking Out New LowsT• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:15 AM • Jonathan Weber•64 CommentsRogers Communications Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRCI• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:11 AM • SA TranscriptsSamsung Is Very Well Placed To Boom From An Increased Demand For Computer ChipsSSNLF• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:49 AM • Matt Bohlsen•13 CommentsPlexus Corp. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPLXS• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:28 AM • SA TranscriptsCamtek: Why We Sold Our PCB ActivityCAMT• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:06 AM • Camtek Ltd.•3 CommentsBaidu - Autonomous Driving As A Free OptionBIDU• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:49 AM • Kenra InvestorsSAP AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSAP• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:46 AM • SA TranscriptsPotential Multibaggers Pt.3: Momo Has MojoMOMO• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:07 AM • From Growth to Value•26 CommentsWhatsApp Goes Spotty In China, Headed For Shutout?FB• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:04 AM • Doug Young•11 CommentsOptimism Returns To Super Micro Computer StockSMCI• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:48 AM • Shareholders Unite•5 CommentsAdding Intel In 2017INTC• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:38 AM • The Money Madam•11 CommentsApple Becomes A Little Less SecretiveAAPL• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:39 AM • Mark Hibben•46 Comments58.Com: A Secular Growth StoryWUBA• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:26 PM • ONeil Trader•3 CommentsQualcomm Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesQCOM• Wed, Jul. 19, 7:42 PM • SA Transcripts•29 CommentsBenchmark Electronics Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBHE• Wed, Jul. 19, 7:29 PM • SA TranscriptsFrontier Communications Is UninvestableFTR• Wed, Jul. 19, 5:10 PM • Bank On Insight•78 Comments123456...1160Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Vodafone Group's (VOD) CEO Vittorio Colao on Q1 2018 Trading Update Conference Call (Transcript)


VOD•
      Sat, Jul. 22,  5:03 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Metso Corporation's (MXTOF) CEO Matti Kähkönen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MXTOF•
      Sat, Jul. 22, 12:08 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ingenico Group's (INGIF) CEO Philippe Lazare on Acquisition of Bambora & Q2 2017 Trading Update (Transcript)


INGIF•
      Fri, Jul. 21, 10:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Danske Bank's (DNSKF) CEO Thomas Borgen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DNSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cinedigm (CIDM) Cinedigm Bison Agreement Conference (Transcript)


CIDM•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Western Alliance Bancorporation's (WAL) CEO Robert Sarver on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WAL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Mobile Mini's (MINI) CEO Erik Olsson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MINI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:55 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Givaudan's (GVDNY) CEO Gilles Andrier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GVDNY•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MB Financial's (MBFI) CEO Mitchell Feiger on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MBFI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cementos Pacasmayo's (CPAC) CEO Humberto Nadal on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPAC•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sensient Technologies' (SXT) CEO Paul Manning on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SXT•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Moody's (MCO) CEO Raymond McDaniel on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MCO•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Regions Financial's (RF) CEO Grayson Hall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Accell Group (ACGPF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACGPF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:52 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Del Frisco's Restaurant Group's (DFRG) CEO Norman Abdallah on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFRG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Volaris Aviation's (VLRS) CEO Enrique Beltranena on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VLRS•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Colgate-Palmolive's (CL) CEO Ian Cook on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



McClatchy's (MNI) CEO Craig Forman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MNI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:42 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Badger Meter's (BMI) CEO Rich Meeusen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BMI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




OFG Bancorp's (OFG) CEO Jose Rafael Fernandez on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




General Electric's (GE) CEO Jeff Immelt on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GE•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:24 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•15 Comments 



Husky's (HUSKF) CEO Rob Peabody on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Glacier Bancorp's (GBCI) CEO Randall Chesler on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GBCI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Honeywell International's (HON) CEO Darius Adamczyk on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HON•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:15 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



CoBiz Financial's (COBZ) CEO Steve Bangert on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


COBZ•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ameris Bancorp's (ABCB) CEO Edwin Hortman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ABCB•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:46 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Banco Latinoamericano De Comercio Exterior's (BLX) CEO Rubens Amaral On Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BLX•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Citizens Financial Group's (CFG) CEO Bruce Van Saun on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Kansas City Southern's (KSU) CEO Patrick Ottensmeyer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KSU•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Huntington Bancshares' (HBAN) CEO Steve Steinour on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HBAN•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  2:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 




123456...4430Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 



Randall Lipps - Wikipedia





















 






Randall Lipps

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article is an orphan, as no other articles link to it. Please introduce links to this page from related articles; try the Find link tool for suggestions. (April 2012)







The topic of this article may not meet Wikipedia's notability guideline for biographies. Please help to establish notability by citing reliable secondary sources that are independent of the topic and provide significant coverage of it beyond its mere trivial mention. If notability cannot be established, the article is likely to be merged, redirected, or deleted.
Find sources: "Randall Lipps" – news · newspapers · books · scholar · JSTOR (February 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Randall A. Lipps is the chairman, president and chief executive officer of Omnicell, Inc., a provider of systems and software solutions to increase patient safety and operational efficiency in health care facilities.[1][2] He is also the director at large of the American Society of Health-System Pharmacists Foundation’s Board of Directors [3] and is a member of the Board of Directors for Radisphere, a radiology provider.[4]
Early life[edit]
Lipps has served as chairman of the board and director of Omnicell, Inc. since he founded the company in September 1992. He holds both a B.S. in economics and a B.B.A. from Southern Methodist University.[5]
References[edit]



^ http://people.forbes.com/profile/randall-a-lipps/59957
^ http://www.sbnonline.com/2010/02/long-term-deals-how-randall-lipps-creates-a-90-percent-win-rate-with-customers-at-omnicell/
^ http://www.ashpfoundation.org/MainMenuCategories/AboutUs/BoardofDirectors.aspx
^ http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20111109005593/en/Hospital-Efficiency-Patient-Safety-Pioneer-Randall-Lipps
^ http://people.forbes.com/profile/randall-a-lipps/59957



External links[edit]

Lydia Dishman, "How Technology Thwarts the Real-Life Nurse Jackie", Fast Company
"Streamlining Hospitals: Omnicell CEO Randy Lipps (Part 1)", Sramana Mitra's One Million by One Million Blog
Douglas E. Caldwell, "He built firm by selling efficiency", Silicon Valley Business Journal'





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Randall_Lipps&oldid=721177399"					
Categories: American technology chief executivesLiving peopleSouthern Methodist University alumniHidden categories: Orphaned articles from April 2012All orphaned articlesArticles with topics of unclear notability from February 2012All articles with topics of unclear notability 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 20 May 2016, at 05:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Randall Lipps Investments                                                                                                - Elkhart                                           , IN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



IN



Elkhart



Investors, Nec



Investors, Nec



                            Randall Lipps Investments
                                    



 





















R 


Randall Lipps Investments                                                                                               
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



230 N MAIN ST STE 4 ELKHART, IN 46516
Get Directions



(574) 389-8500
 





Business Info



 Founded 2007
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $484,552.00
 Employee Count 5
 Industries Investors, Nec
 Contacts Randall Lipps                                                                                                           







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Randall Lipps Investments                                                                                                is located at 230 N Main St Ste 4 in Elkhart and has been in the business of Investors, Nec since 2007. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







R

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Randall Lipps at Omnicell, Inc. Contact Details | LeadFerret.com



















Login with your social account:

OR 










Forgot Password?
Create a Free Account!Sign Up!








LeadFerret




Search


Contacts
Specialty Directories




About Us


Blog
Company
FAQs
Partners
Careers
Contact Us
Privacy Policy




Help


FAQ
Tutorials




Buy Points




Earn Points




SalesNexus







1-866-535-3960













Company & Contact Directories


Companies


Contacts






Contact Details for Randall Lipps









Randall
Lipps



President, Chief Executive Officer


Contact Information

Phone:
(650) 251-6120


Email:

Please log in or register to see the details.




Social Links

Twitter:

Please log in or register to see the details.



Facebook:

Please log in or register to see the details.



LinkedIn:

Please log in or register to see the details.



Google+:

Please log in or register to see the details.




Company Information


Name:
Omnicell, Inc.


Address:

1201 Charleston Road
Mountain View
CA
94043



Phone:
650-251-6100


Website:
http://www.omnicell.com/



View Complete Company Profile





Claim Profile
Is this you? Claim your profile to update and/or remove this information.

Quality score70out of 100





Others with Similar First and Last Names


First Name
Last name
Title
Company Name


Randall
Lipps
Chief Executive Officer
Lewis&Summers





List of colleagues of Randall Lipps at Omnicell, Inc.


First Name
Last name
Title



Bobbi
Jamriska
Product Manager, Medication Automation




Marga
Ortigas-Wedekind
Vice President-Marketing




Kent
Roberts
Senior Marketing Manager




Deborah
Reinert
Senior Director, Marketing and Corporate Communications




James
Hudson
Vice President Finance and Interim Chief Financial Officer




Jordan
Reddick
Messaging Systems Administrator




Gary
Ervin
Vice President International Sales




Raymond
Yung
Omnicell Hong Kong Sourcing Manager




Joseph
Coyne
Chief Information Officer




Rich
Harbaugh
Senior, Information Technology Operations Engineer




Eric
Lindquist
Senior Vice President Marketing




Ray
Vrabe
Product Marketing Director




John
Choma
VP Organizational Development, Learning, and Performance




Dan
Peterson
Software Architect




James
Judson
Interim Chief Financial Officer, Vice President-Finance




Lisa
Kennedy Book
Clinical System Sales Director




Rick
Owen
Senior Vice President Engineer Manufacturing




Ray
Vrabel
Product Marketing Director, WorkflowRx




Michael
Hanna
Vice President of Sales and FIELD Operations




Conan
Tran
Software Engineer




Alice
Weyman
Programmer/Analyst




Andy
Uhl
Programmer/Analyst




Carl
Schleutermanmba
Controller




Jennifer
Johnson
Office Manager




Chalapathi
Rao
Senior Director of Software Engineering




Rob
Sein
Vice President-Finance & Chief Financial Officer




Jorge
Taborga
Chief Information Officer




Frank
Stummeyer
Manager Information Technology and Infrastructure




Larry
Keating
Senior Integration




Will
Winkley
Project Manager




Mark
O'Hagan
Corporate Controller




Gilbert
Khalil
Director Contracts




Corey
Peterson
Sales Systems Integration Engineer




Dianne
St Regis
Senior Director, Finance




Robert
Johnson
Applications Development




Brian
Heaton
Regional Service Manager




Daniel
Fuller
IT Manager




Dolph
Larson
Software Engineer




Randy
Lipps
Chairman, President & Chief Executive Officer




Daniel
Johnston
Senior Vice President and General council




Tony
Vo
Senior Systems Engineer




Antonio
Hursh
Director Systems Operations




Jorge
Taborga
Chief Information Officer




Susan
Pranes
Senior Director, Information Technolog...




Randall
Lipps
President, Chief Executive Officer




Robert
Mullenger
Group Manager Product Marketing




Job
Barranta
Sales Systems Integration Engineer




Len
Hom
Senior Manager, Product




Harry
Bertram
Senior Director, Field Operations




Nat
Moody
Software Engineer-team Lead




Frank
Stummeyer
Information Technology Infrastructure Manager




John
Burgess
Senior Manager, Global Logistics




Inga
Vailionis
Director




Kathleen
Mcmahon
Trade Show Coordinator




Pat
Yip
Educational Training Coordinator




Frank
Stummeyer
Information Technology Infrastructure Manager




Jeff
Blank
Engineer




John
D'ambrosio
Project Manager




Ashwini
Sharma
Senior Software Engineer




Cindy
Levy
Senior Software Engineer




Rob
Johnson
Information Technology Applications Manager




Susan
Pranes
Senior Director, Information Technology




Jeff
Kropp
Senior Medication Systems Sales Director




Dan
Johnston
Senior Vice President and General Counsel




Nancy
Houtz
Senior Programmer




John
Brottem
Senior Director , Associate General Counsel




Rita
Rosenblum
National Sales Training Manager




Christine
Robertson
Manager Information Technology




Tami
Lam
Senior Accountant




Ravi kumar
Pothireddy
Principal Engineer




Marga
Ortigas-Wedekind
Vice President / Marketing




Jorge
Taborga
Chief Information Officer




James
Gillreath
Information Technology




Ed
Albrough
System Sales Director




Pam
Jamison
Manager , Human Resources




Dominic
Carissimi
Technical Systems Specialist




Joe
Lynch
Senior Director Marketing




Brad
Blackwell
Pharmacy Product Marketing Manager




Paul
Adcox
Hr Manager




Felisa
Orozco
System Sales Director




Jeff
Schlossnagle
Director Sales




Nat
Moody
Software Engineer-Team Lead, SW Development-Software Development Manager-Director, Software Engineering




Wendi
Ellis
Director of Staffing




Ross
Fosler
Director Software Engineering










×
–
A message from LeadFerret







Close




New Message
↑
 LeadFerret Chat



Loading...


























403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.






Lipps  Randall - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Lipps  Randall
Check out list of companies and businesses related to Lipps  Randall. Find out Lipps  Randall address and contact details. View other people related to Lipps  Randall - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

c/o Invuity, Inc. 39 Stillman Street San Francisco 94107 CA




Companies related to Lipps  Randall
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001393020Invuity, Inc.444 DE HARO STREET  San Francisco 94107




Lipps  Randall on the Web
Persons related to Lipps  Randall - Invuity, Inc.NamePositionCityVayser  AlexSan FranciscoVayser  AlexSan FranciscoVayser  AlexSan FranciscoSteven  AnnenVP Product Mgmt & Strategy SAN FRANCISCORobertson  BrettSan FranciscoRobertson  BrettSan FranciscoGREGORY B  BROWNWALTHAMWILLIAM W  BURKEDirector HAYWARDEhrlich  ChrisSan FranciscoEhrlich  ChrisSan FranciscoBRUCE A  CLEVELANDSAN MATEOMead, Jr.  DanaSan FranciscoMead  DanaSan FranciscoPaul O  DavisonVP of Research & Development SAN FRANCISCODEERFIELD CAPITAL LP ET ALNEW YORKMANAGEMENT CO /NY  DEERFIELDDeerfield Special Situations Fund, L.P.NEW YORKKeval  DesaiMENLO PARKRimer  DougSan FranciscoHeigel  DouglasSan FranciscoRoberts  EricSan FranciscoRoberts  EricSan FranciscoJames E  Flynn10% Owner NEW YORKMichael  GandySAN FRANCISCOCurtis  GarySan FranciscoCurtis  GarySan FranciscoRobert  GerberichVP of Sales SAN FRANCISCOPHILIP T  GIANOSBrison  GigiSan FranciscoBrisson  GigiSan FranciscoBrown  GregorySan FranciscoBrown  GregorySan FranciscoLucier  GregorySan FranciscoJoseph James  GuidoVP Comm Mktg & Bus Development MOUNTAIN VIEWHadley Harbor Master Investors (Cayman) L.P.10% Owner BOSTONHealthCare Royalty Management, LLCSTAMFORDHealthCare Royalty Partners II, L.P.10% Owner STAMFORDDouglas W  HeigelVP of Operations HAYWARDW Stephen  HolmesMENLO PARKInterWest Management Partners X, LLCMENLO PARKINTERWEST PARTNERS X LP10% Owner MENLO PARKDiamond  JonSan FranciscoDiamond  JonathanSan FranciscoGasson  JonathanSan FranciscoHayes  KennethSan FranciscoTrauner  KennethSan FranciscoTrauner  KennethSan FranciscoTrauner  KennethSan FranciscoNina S  KjellsonMENLO PARKKLEINER PERKINS CAUFIELD & BYERS XII, LLCMENLO PARKGilbert H  KlimanMENLO PARKKPCB XII Associates, LLC10% Owner MENLO PARKKPCB XII Founders Fund, LLCMENLO PARKRANDALL A  LIPPSDirector MOUNTAIN VIEWGREGORY T  LUCIERDirector CARLSBADJames H  MackanessChief Financial Officer MOUNTAIN VIEWSusan  MartinVP of Marketing SAN FRANCISCOGandy  MichaelSan FranciscoGandy  MichaelSan FranciscoKHALED  NASRSAN FRANCISCOARNOLD L  ORONSKYMENLO PARKDavison  PaulSan FranciscoDouglas A  PepperMENLO PARKSawyer  PhilipSan FranciscoSawyer  PhilipSan FranciscoSawyer  PhilipSan FranciscoLipps  RandallSan FranciscoLipps  RandallSan FranciscoZadno  RezaSan FranciscoZadno  RezaSan FranciscoGerberich  RobertSan FranciscoGerberich  RobertSan FranciscoEric W  RobertsDirector NEW YORKBRETT  ROBERTSONSee Remarks EMERYVILLEAndrew  SaleSenior VP Global Sales SAN FRANCISCOPHILIP M  SAWYERPresident and CEO SAN FRANCISCOBrandner-Allen  TheresaSan FranciscoAlex  VayserChief Technology Officer SAN FRANCISCOReza  ZadnoDirector PALO ALTO
Potentially same personNameCityCountryLipps  RandallSan FranciscoCA




Other people with surname LippsLipps  Randy, Lipps  Scott, Lipps  Scott








 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



 Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search






  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results

Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip


What's Your Age?


Submit
I don't know

Skip























Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



 Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



 Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















randall a lipps - WOW.com - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation

















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images




Reference


Reference










We Found Randall Lipps | BeenVerified.com



Ad
 ·
www.BeenVerified.com/​Randall Lipps



1) Randall Lipps's Phone 2) Address 3) Age & More. Search Free!





People Search



Search By Name



Search by Email




Best Background Check



Social Media



Get Contact Information





Randall Lipps - Search for Randall Lipps.



Ad
 ·
Ask.com/​Randall Lipps



Search for Randall Lipps. Find Results on Ask.com.





Ask a Question



Explore Q&A




Questions and Answers



Ask.com – What’s your Question?





Find Anyone's Records | peoplelooker.com



Ad
 ·
www.peoplelooker.com/​Randall Lipps



Have Information at Your Fingertips Instantly. Try PeopleLooker Today!





Uncover Potential Relatives



Location History



Photos & Videos



Email Address





Searches related torandall a lipps



randy lipps


peter kuipers omnicell


nhat ngo


omnicell board members



rob seim omnicell


omnicell wikipedia


omnicell earnings call


jorge taborga




Web Results

Omnicell Management Team

https://www.omnicell.com/About_Omnicell/Management_Team.aspx


Omnicell is led by an accomplished, capable team of executives: Randall A. Lipps Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer, and Founder. Randall Lipps founded ...


Randall A. Lipps - Executive Bio, Compensation History ...

people.equilar.com/bio/randall-lipps-omnicell/salary/11855


View Randall A. Lipps, Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer at Omnicell, Inc., Mountain View, CA, executive profile on Equilar Atlas to see current salary ...


Randall A. Lipps - Salary.com

www1.salary.com/Randall-A-Lipps-Salary-Bonus-Stock-Options-for...


Salary, bonuses, stock options, stock awards and other compensation for Randall A. Lipps , Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer at OMNICELL INC. How much ...


Randall A. Lipps, Chairman, President and CEO of Omnicell ...

https://www.omnicell.com/News_and_Events/Press_Releases/Randall_A...


Randall A. Lipps, Chairman, President and CEO of Omnicell, Inc., Selected to Join UCSF School of Nursing Board of Overseers. Lipps to contribute experience in ...


Randall A. Lipps - Executive Bio & Compensation History

executives.findthecompany.com/l/19791/Randall-A-Lipps


Find compensation and employment information for Randall A. Lipps (Omnicell), including salary, stock awards, and previous employers.


Randall A. Lipps - Invuity

invuity.com/about-us/board-of-directors/randy-lipps


CEO, Chairman and Founder Omnicell, Inc. Randall A. Lipps has served as a member of our board of directors since June 2013. In September 1992, Mr. Lipps founded ...


Randall A. Lipps - Omnicell.com - The Wall Street Transcript

https://www.twst.com/interview/randall-a-lipps-omnicell-com


RANDALL A. LIPPS founded Omnicell, Inc. in September 1992 and serves as the company's Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer. Under Mr. Lipps' leadership ...


Randall Lipps - Wikipedia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Randall_Lipps


Randall A. Lipps is the chairman, president and chief executive officer of Omnicell, Inc., a provider of systems and software solutions to increase patient safety and ...


Randall A. Lipps: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg

https://www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/person.asp?...


Mr. Randall A. Lipps, also known as Randy, founded Omnicell, Inc. in September 1992 and has been its Chief Executive Officer and President since October 2002. Mr.


Randall A Lipps - Atherton, CA | Intelius

https://www.intelius.com/people/Randall-Lipps/Atherton-CA/08MR1053ZYF


Get full contact details for Randall A Lipps in Atherton, CA instantly. We found 11 addresses, 4 phone numbers, and 8 relatives and/or associates connected with this ...










We Found Randall Lipps | BeenVerified.com



Ad
 ·
www.BeenVerified.com/​Randall Lipps



1) Randall Lipps's Phone 2) Address 3) Age & More. Search Free!





People Search



Search By Name



Search by Email




Best Background Check



Social Media



Get Contact Information





Randall Lipps - Search for Randall Lipps.



Ad
 ·
Ask.com/​Randall Lipps



Search for Randall Lipps. Find Results on Ask.com.





Ask a Question



Explore Q&A




Questions and Answers



Ask.com – What’s your Question?





Find Anyone's Records | peoplelooker.com



Ad
 ·
www.peoplelooker.com/​Randall Lipps



Have Information at Your Fingertips Instantly. Try PeopleLooker Today!





Uncover Potential Relatives



Location History



Photos & Videos



Email Address




Searches related torandall a lipps



randy lipps


peter kuipers omnicell


nhat ngo


omnicell board members



rob seim omnicell


omnicell wikipedia


omnicell earnings call


jorge taborga




12345Next






Answers







Randall Lipps



Randall A. Lipps is the chairman, president and chief executive officer of Omnicell, Inc. a provider of systems and software solutions to increase...

more






Karl Terkal



Franz Lehár, etc. Selected recordings 1951 - La bohème - Trude Eipperle, Karl Terkal, Wilma Lipp, Alfred Poell - Bavarian Radio Chorus and Orchestra,...

more






Electric Zoo



Electric Zoo is an annual electronic music festival held over Labor Day weekend in New York City on Randall's Island. The festival represents all...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | About our Ads
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Part of the AOL Search Network.








